Maryland, session 2026, SB0242.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
Article – State Government
9–1A–06.
(a) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE
following persons shall be licensed under this subtitle:
(1) a video lottery operator;
(2) a manufacturer;
(3) a person not licensed under item (1) or (2) of this subsection who
manages, operates, supplies, provides security for, or provides service, maintenance, or
repairs for video lottery terminals or table games; and
(4) a video lottery employee.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection OR §
10–14A–03 OF THIS ARTICLE, unless an individual holds a valid license issued under this
subtitle, the individual may not be employed by a licensee as a video lottery employee.
9–1E–05.
(a) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE
following persons shall be licensed under this subtitle:
(1) a person that operates sports wagering;
(2) a person that operates sports wagering on behalf of a sports wagering
licensee, including an online sports wagering operator;
(3) a person not licensed under item (1) or (2) of this subsection that
manages, operates, supplies, provides security for, or provides service, maintenance, or
repairs for sports wagering equipment and devices; and
(4) an individual directly employed in the operation of sports wagering by
a sports wagering licensee if the individual does not otherwise hold a valid license under
Subtitle 1A of this title.
9–901.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Active duty” has the meaning stated in 37 U.S.C. § 101.
– 7 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) “Active service member” means an individual who is:
(1) an active duty member of the uniformed services; or
(2) serving in a reserve component of the uniformed services on active duty
orders.
(d) “Armed forces” has the meaning stated in 10 U.S.C. § 101.
(h) “Reserve component” has the meaning stated in 37 U.S.C. § 101.
(j) “Service member” means an individual who is a member of:
(1) the uniformed services; or
(2) a reserve component of the uniformed services.
(l) “Uniformed services” has the meaning stated in 37 U.S.C. § 101.
SUBTITLE 14A. LICENSING – ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBERS AND SPOUSES.
10–14A–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
(C) “LICENSE” MEANS A LICENSE, PERMIT, CERTIFICATION,
REGISTRATION, OR OTHER LEGAL AUTHORIZATION REQUIRED FOR ENGAGING IN AN
OCCUPATION OR A PROFESSION.
(D) “LICENSING AUTHORITY” MEANS AN AGENCY OF THE STATE THAT
ISSUES A LICENSE.
10–14A–02.
THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY WITH RESPECT TO AN OCCUPATION OR A
PROFESSION FOR WHICH AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HOLDS A LICENSE ISSUED IN BY
ANOTHER JURISDICTION STATE MAY PRACTICE IN THE STATE UNDER AN
INTERSTATE COMPACT.
10–14A–03.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(A) AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER OR THE SPOUSE OF AN ACTIVE SERVICE
MEMBER WHO RELOCATES TO THE STATE BECAUSE OF ORDERS FOR SERVICE AND
HOLDS A LICENSE ISSUED BY ANOTHER JURISDICTION STATE MAY PRACTICE IN THE
STATE UNDER THE LICENSE FOR THE DURATION OF THE ORDERS IF:
(1) THE ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER OR SPOUSE OF AN ACTIVE SERVICE
MEMBER SUBMITS AN APPLICATION TO THE LICENSING AUTHORITY THAT
INCLUDES:
(I) PROOF OF THE ORDERS;
(II) IF THE APPLICANT IS THE SPOUSE OF AN ACTIVE SERVICE
MEMBER, A COPY OF THE MARRIAGE CERTIFICATE; AND
(III) A NOTARIZED AFFIDAVIT AFFIRMING, UNDER THE PENALTY
OF LAW, THAT:
1. THE APPLICANT IS THE INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED AND
IDENTIFIED IN THE APPLICATION;
2. ALL STATEMENTS MADE IN THE APPLICATION ARE
TRUE, CORRECT, AND COMPLETE;
3. THE APPLICANT HAS READ AND UNDERSTANDS THE
REQUIREMENTS TO RECEIVE A LICENSE AND THE SCOPE OF PRACTICE OF THE
STATE;
4. THE APPLICANT CERTIFIES THAT THE APPLICANT
MEETS AND WILL COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS AND SCOPE OF PRACTICE
DESCRIBED IN ITEM 3 OF THIS ITEM; AND
5. THE APPLICANT IS IN GOOD STANDING IN ALL
JURISDICTIONS STATES IN WHICH THE APPLICANT HOLDS OR HAS HELD A LICENSE;
(2) THE APPLICANT IS IN GOOD STANDING WITH THE REGULATORY
AUTHORITY THAT ISSUED THE LICENSE;
(3) NO DISCIPLINARY ACTION, INCLUDING REVOCATION, HAS BEEN
TAKEN BY A REGULATORY AUTHORITY AGAINST THE APPLICANT REGARDING THE
LICENSE;
– 9 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) NO INVESTIGATION RELATING TO UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT IS
PENDING AGAINST THE APPLICANT REGARDING THE LICENSE; AND
(5) THE APPLICANT HAS NOT VOLUNTARILY SURRENDERED THE
LICENSE WHILE UNDER INVESTIGATION FOR UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT BY A
REGULATORY AUTHORITY.
(B) IF A LICENSING AUTHORITY IS REQUIRED TO CONSIDER WHETHER A
LICENSE IS VALID UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION BUT CANNOT CARRY
OUT THE REQUIREMENT DURING THE 30 DAYS IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING THE
RECEIPT OF THE APPLICATION, THE LICENSING AUTHORITY MAY ISSUE A
TEMPORARY LICENSE TO THE APPLICANT THAT CONFERS THE SAME RIGHTS,
PRIVILEGES, AND RESPONSIBILITIES AS A PERMANENT LICENSE.
(C) A LICENSING AUTHORITY THAT RECEIVES AN APPLICATION SUBMITTED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION MAY CONDUCT A CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECK OF THE APPLICANT BEFORE AUTHORIZING THE APPLICANT TO
PRACTICE IN THE STATE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION OR ISSUING A
TEMPORARY LICENSE TO THE APPLICANT UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) IF AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER OR SPOUSE OF AN ACTIVE SERVICE
MEMBER IS AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE IN THE STATE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION:
(1) THE ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER OR SPOUSE OF AN ACTIVE SERVICE
MEMBER MAY PRACTICE UNDER THE LICENSE ONLY IN THE DISCIPLINE AND TO THE
EXTENT OF THE SCOPE OF PRACTICE WITHIN WHICH THE LICENSE ALLOWS THE
ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER OR SPOUSE OF AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER TO PRACTICE
IN THE OTHER JURISDICTION STATE; AND
(2) THE LICENSING AUTHORITY MAY NOT REQUIRE THE ACTIVE
SERVICE MEMBER OR SPOUSE OF AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER TO OBTAIN A
LICENSE ISSUED BY THE LICENSING AUTHORITY UNLESS THE ACTIVE SERVICE
MEMBER OR SPOUSE OF AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER IS SEEKING TO PRACTICE IN A
DIFFERENT DISCIPLINE OR WITHIN A DIFFERENT SCOPE OF PRACTICE THAN THAT
DESCRIBED IN ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
10–14A–04.
AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER OR SPOUSE OF AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER
THAT IS AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE UNDER § 10–14A–03 OF THIS SUBTITLE:
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(1) MAY PRACTICE TO THE SAME EXTENT AND IN THE SAME CAPACITY
AS AN INDIVIDUAL LICENSED BY A LICENSING AUTHORITY IN THE STATE,
INCLUDING SUPERVISING AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS LICENSED IN THE STATE WHO IS
REQUIRED TO PRACTICE UNDER SUPERVISION; AND
(2) IS SUBJECT TO THE SAME DISCIPLINARY AUTHORITY OF A
LICENSING AUTHORITY AS AN INDIVIDUAL LICENSED BY THE LICENSING AUTHORITY
IN THE STATE.
10–14A–05.
EACH LICENSING AUTHORITY MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBTITLE.
Article – Agriculture
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Department” means the State Department of Agriculture.
(i) “Secretary” means Secretary of Agriculture or [his] THE SECRETARY’S
designee.
2–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Veterinary Medical Examiners.
(c) “Direct supervision” means that the supervising veterinarian who is licensed
and registered in the State OR AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE VETERINARY MEDICINE IN
THE STATE UNDER § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE:
(1) Is on the premises of the animal treatment facility;
(2) Is available on an immediate basis; and
(3) Has given written or oral instructions for treatment of the animal
patients involved.
(c–1) “Immediate supervision” means the supervising veterinarian who is licensed
and registered in the State OR AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE VETERINARY MEDICINE IN
THE STATE UNDER § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE is in the
– 11 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
immediate area and within audible and visual range of the animal patient and the person
treating the patient.
(c–2) “Indirect supervision” means the supervising veterinarian who is licensed and
registered in the State OR AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE VETERINARY MEDICINE IN THE
STATE UNDER § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE:
(1) Is not required to be in the same facility or in close proximity to the
individual being supervised; and
(2) (i) Has given written or oral instructions for treatment of the animal
patient involved;
(ii) Is available to provide supervision by electronic or telephonic
means; and
(iii) Has arranged for telephonic consultation with a licensed
veterinarian, if necessary.
(d) “License” means a license to practice veterinary medicine in the State.
(i) “Veterinary practitioner” means [a]:
(1) A licensed and registered veterinarian engaged in the practice of
veterinary medicine; OR
(2) AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE VETERINARY
MEDICINE IN THE STATE UNDER § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE AND IS ENGAGED IN THE PRACTICE OF VETERINARY MEDICINE.
2–313.
(a) (2) A person may not:
(i) Practice veterinary medicine unless the person is [licensed]:
1. LICENSED, registered, and authorized to engage in the
practice under the provisions of this subtitle; OR
2. AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE VETERINARY MEDICINE
IN THE STATE UNDER § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE;
5–207.
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(a) (1) [Each] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, EACH pest control consultant, pest control applicator, or public
agency applicator shall obtain an annual certificate indicating competence in one or more
established categories from the Secretary. [Each]
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, EACH private applicator shall obtain a certificate which shall
require periodic renewal as determined by the Secretary.
(h) (1) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, A person who sells or distributes a restricted use pesticide shall
hold a dealer permit from the Secretary.
8–802.
(a) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, A person may not prepare a nutrient management plan, for purposes of meeting
the requirements of this subtitle, unless the person is certified or licensed by the State.
8–803.4.
(a) In this section, “fertilizer” means a commercial fertilizer and specialty
fertilizer.
(c) (1) Each place of business at which a person is employed to apply fertilizer
to property specified under subsection (b)(1) of this section shall:
(i) Have a professional fertilizer applicator on staff who has
obtained a fertilizer application certification in accordance with § 8–803.6 of this subtitle;
and
(ii) [Be] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, BE licensed annually by the Department.
(2) An applicant for a license under this subsection shall:
(i) Submit to the Department an application on the form the
Department requires; and
(ii) Pay to the Department an application fee set by the Department.
11–405.
(a) [Every] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, EVERY purchaser or hauler of milk or other fluid dairy products
– 13 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
who is involved in the testing of samples shall have these operations performed only by
individuals licensed by the Secretary.
(b) [Any] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ANY person who calibrates a farm milk tank, other than the
owner of the tank, first shall obtain a license from the Secretary.
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Department” means the Maryland Department of Labor.
2–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Board” means the State Board of Public Accountancy.
2–301.
Except as provided in § 2–321 of this subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice certified public accountancy in the State.
3–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Board” means, unless the context requires otherwise, the State Board of
Architects.
3–302.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice architecture in the State.
(b) (1) An architect who resides outside the State and meets the requirements
for a license by reciprocity under § 3–306 of this subtitle may:
(i) offer to practice architecture in the State; and
(ii) accept a commission to practice architecture in the State.
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection, the architect shall be
licensed by the Board before the architect may practice architecture in the State.
3–306.
(a) Subject to the provisions of this section, the Board may issue a license by
reciprocity to practice architecture in the State to an individual who:
(1) is licensed to practice architecture in another state or country; or
(2) is certified by the Council under subsection (c) of this section.
(b) The Board may issue a license by reciprocity under this section for an
applicant who is licensed to practice architecture in another state or country only if the
applicant:
(1) is of good character and reputation;
(2) pays to the Board:
(i) a nonrefundable application fee set by the Board; and
(ii) a license fee set by the Board; and
(3) provides adequate evidence that:
(i) the applicant became licensed in the other state or country after
meeting, in that or any other state or country, requirements that were at least equivalent
to those then required by the laws of this State; or
(ii) at the time of application for a license by reciprocity under this
section, the applicant meets the requirements currently required by the laws of this State.
(c) The Board may issue a license by reciprocity under this section for an
applicant who is certified by the Council only if:
(1) the applicant:
(i) is of good character and reputation; and
(ii) pays to the Board:
1. a nonrefundable application fee set by the Board; and
2. a license fee set by the Board; and
– 15 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) the Board receives from the Council a certified copy of its certificate for
the applicant that certifies that the applicant is licensed to practice architecture in another
state or country.
(d) An architect who is granted a license by reciprocity by the Board may not be
required to maintain licensure in any other state or country as a condition of maintaining
the license granted by the Board.
(E) AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE IN THE STATE UNDER §
10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO
APPLY FOR A LICENSE BY RECIPROCITY UNDER THIS SECTION TO PRACTICE IN THE
STATE.
4–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Apprentice barber” means an individual who, under the supervision of AN
INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS a master barber IN THE STATE, is learning
to practice barbering or to provide barber–stylist services in a barbershop that holds a
barbershop permit.
(g) “Board” means the State Board of Barbers.
(l) (2) “Practice barbering” does not include:
(ii) the services performed by an employee under the supervision of
AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS a master barber IN THE STATE in a
barbershop that holds a barbershop permit that are restricted to:
1. shampooing;
2. removal of a hair solution;
3. sterilization of equipment; or
4. similar activities.
4–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board to practice
barbering before the individual may practice barbering in the State.
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(b) If an individual holds the appropriate barber–stylist limited license, the
individual may practice barbering in a manner limited to providing barber–stylist services.
(c) This section does not apply to:
(1) a student while the student practices barbering or provides barber–
stylist services in accordance with § 4–301.1 or § 4–301.2 of this subtitle;
(2) a registered apprentice barber; or
(3) an individual authorized in the discretion of the Board to practice
barbering or to provide barber–stylist services under special circumstances.
4–301.2.
(b) A student may practice barbering or provide barber–stylist services under this
section only if the student:
(4) while practicing barbering or providing barber–stylist services, works
under the direct supervision of an individual who is AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS a
[licensed] master barber IN THE STATE who agrees to periodically report on the progress
of the student to the barbering teacher or the work–study coordinator.
(c) Under this section, there may not be more than three students working under
the supervision of AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS a [licensed] master
barber IN THE STATE.
4–302.
(b) (1) An applicant for a barber license shall have completed successfully:
(i) 2. an apprenticeship of at least 2,250 hours within 2 years in
a barbershop that holds a barbershop permit under the supervision of AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS a master barber IN THE STATE; and
(c) (1) An applicant for a barber–stylist limited license shall have completed
successfully:
(i) 2. an apprenticeship of at least 1,650 hours within 18 months
in a barbershop that holds a barbershop permit under the supervision of AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS a master barber IN THE STATE; and
4–404.
– 17 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) While registration as an apprentice barber is in effect, the registration
authorizes the individual to learn to practice barbering or to learn to provide barber–stylist
services:
(2) under the supervision of AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE
AS a master barber IN THE STATE.
4–507.
(d) (1) An apprentice barber under complete and constant supervision of AN
INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS a master barber IN THE STATE may assist
the INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS A master barber in starting or
completing an operation. The master barber or barbershop may charge the usual fees for
the operation.
4–509.
(a) The owner shall designate AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS
a master barber IN THE STATE to supervise each apprentice barber who is learning to
practice barbering or to provide barber–stylist services in the barbershop.
(b) The owner or a designated INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS A
master barber IN THE STATE shall file monthly a report, on a form supplied by the Board,
that:
(1) states the progress of each apprentice barber employed by the
barbershop; and
(2) identifies the INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS A master
barber IN THE STATE supervising each apprentice barber.
(c) The owner and the INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS A master
barber IN THE STATE supervising an apprentice barber immediately shall advise the
Board in writing of:
(1) the date on which an apprentice barber ceases learning to practice
barbering or to provide barber–stylist services at the barbershop, temporarily or
permanently; and
(2) the reason for the cessation.
5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(b) “Apprentice” means an individual who is learning to practice cosmetology or
any limited practice of cosmetology in a beauty salon that holds a beauty salon permit under
the supervision of:
(1) if learning to practice cosmetology, AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO
PRACTICE AS a [licensed] senior cosmetologist IN THE STATE;
(2) if learning to provide esthetic services, AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED
TO PRACTICE AS a [licensed] senior cosmetologist IN THE STATE or AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS a [licensed] esthetician IN THE STATE with 2 years’
experience;
(3) if learning to provide hair services, AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO
PRACTICE AS a [licensed] senior cosmetologist IN THE STATE or AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS a [licensed] hairstylist IN THE STATE with 2 years’
experience; and
(4) if learning to provide nail technician services, AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS a [licensed] senior cosmetologist IN THE STATE or AN
INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS a [licensed] nail technician IN THE STATE
with 2 years’ experience.
(e) “Board” means the State Board of Cosmetologists.
5–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board to practice
cosmetology before the individual may practice cosmetology in the State.
5–303.
(b) A student may practice cosmetology under this section only if the student:
(4) while practicing cosmetology, works under the direct supervision of an
individual [who is a licensed] AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS A senior cosmetologist IN
THE STATE who agrees to periodically report on the progress of the student to the
cosmetology teacher or the work–study coordinator.
5–404.
(a) While registration as an apprentice is in effect, the registration authorizes the
individual to learn to practice cosmetology or any limited practice of cosmetology:
(1) in a:
– 19 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) beauty salon that holds a beauty salon permit; or
(ii) barbershop that holds a barbershop permit; and
(2) under the supervision of:
(i) if learning to practice cosmetology, AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS a [licensed] senior cosmetologist IN THE STATE;
(ii) if learning to provide esthetic services, AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS a [licensed] senior cosmetologist IN THE STATE or AN
INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS a [licensed] esthetician IN THE STATE with
2 years’ experience;
(iii) if learning to provide eyelash extension services:
1. beginning January 1, 2027, AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS a [licensed] senior cosmetologist IN THE STATE AND who
has completed continuing education requirements in providing eyelash extension services;
or
2. [a licensed] AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS AUTHORIZED TO
PRACTICE AS AN eyelash extension technician IN THE STATE with 2 years’ experience;
(iv) if learning to provide hair services, AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS a [licensed] senior cosmetologist IN THE STATE or AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO IS AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS a [licensed] hairstylist IN THE
STATE with 2 years’ experience; and
(v) if learning to provide nail technician services, AN INDIVIDUAL
WHO IS AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS a [licensed] senior cosmetologist IN THE STATE
or AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS a [licensed] nail technician
IN THE STATE with 2 years’ experience.
(b) [A licensed] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS A senior
cosmetologist IN THE STATE may directly train and supervise not more than two
apprentices learning to practice cosmetology or any limited practice of cosmetology
specified in subsection (a)(2) of this section.
6–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(e) “Licensed apprentice electrician” means, unless the context requires
otherwise, an electrician who is licensed by the State Board to assist in providing electrical
services while:
(1) under the direction or control of AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO
PRACTICE AS a [licensed] master electrician IN THE STATE; and
(2) in training to become a journeyperson electrician.
(f) “Licensed journeyperson electrician” means, unless the context requires
otherwise, an electrician who is licensed by the State Board to provide or assist in providing
electrical services while:
(1) under the direction or control of AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO
PRACTICE AS a [licensed] master electrician IN THE STATE; and
(2) in training to become a master electrician.
(l) “State Board” means the State Board of Electricians.
6–301.
(a) Each county shall:
(2) (i) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, require a State license for providing electrical services as a
master electrician, journeyperson electrician, or apprentice electrician; and
(ii) enforce the provisions of this title.
(b) Each municipal corporation shall:
(3) (i) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, require a State license for providing electrical services as an
apprentice, journeyperson, or master electrician; and
(ii) enforce the provisions of this title.
6–303.
This subtitle does not require:
(3) a person to hold a license issued by the State Board if the person:
(i) is licensed or registered under Title 18 of this article to provide
security system services and is acting within the scope of that license;
– 21 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) holds a license issued under Title 12 of this article and is acting
within the scope of that license;
(iii) holds a license issued under Title 9A of the Business Regulation
Article and is acting within the scope of that license; [or]
(iv) provides wireless security systems in compliance with Title 19,
Subtitle 9 of the Business Regulation Article; OR
(V) IS AUTHORIZED TO PROVIDE ELECTRIC SERVICES IN THE
STATE UNDER § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
6.5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Stationary Engineers.
6.5–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board to provide
stationary engineer services before the individual may provide stationary engineer services
in the State.
(b) (1) In this subsection, “resource recovery facility” means a facility that
processes solid waste to produce valuable resources, including steam, electricity, metals, or
refuse–derived fuel.
(2) An individual who provides stationary engineer services at a resource
recovery facility that generates steam or electricity is not required to be licensed by the
Board to provide stationary engineer services if the individual is certified to operate a
resource recovery facility under regulations adopted by the Secretary of the Environment.
7–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Foresters.
7–301.
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice forestry in the State.
7–302.
An individual who meets the educational requirements but does not meet the
experience requirements under § 7–304 of this subtitle may practice forestry without a
license if the individual practices forestry under the responsible charge of [a licensed
forester] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE FORESTRY IN THE STATE.
8–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Certified Interior Designers.
8–301.
Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be certified by the Board before the
individual may use the title “certified interior designer” or the term “certified interior
design services”.
9–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Examiners of Landscape Architects.
9–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice landscape architecture in the State.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(1) an individual who practices landscape architecture while performing
official duties as an employee of the federal government;
(2) an individual while practicing landscape architecture under the
supervision of [a licensed landscape architect] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO
PRACTICE LANDSCAPE ARCHITECTURE IN THE STATE, if the individual does not
assume responsible charge of design or supervision; or
– 23 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) an individual while practicing landscape architecture as an employee
of a person who is authorized to practice landscape architecture, if the employee does not
assume responsible charge of design or supervision.
10–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Admission to the Bar” means, unless the context requires otherwise,
authorization by the Supreme Court of Maryland to practice law in the State.
(d) “Bar” means, unless the context requires otherwise, the Bar of the Supreme
Court of Maryland.
10–206.
(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, before an individual may practice law in
the State, the individual shall:
(1) be admitted to the Bar; and
(2) meet any requirement that the Supreme Court of Maryland may set by
rule.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(1) a person while representing a landlord in a summary ejectment or a
rent escrow proceeding in the District Court of Maryland;
(2) a person while representing a tenant in a summary ejectment or a rent
escrow proceeding in the District Court of Maryland if the person is:
(i) a law student practicing in a clinical law program at a law school
accredited by the American Bar Association with the in–court supervision of a faculty
member; or
(ii) employed by a nonprofit organization receiving grants from the
Maryland Legal Services Corporation and:
1. the person has training and experience;
2. the person is supervised by [a lawyer] AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE LAW IN THE STATE; and
3. the supervising [lawyer’s] INDIVIDUAL’S appearance is
entered in the proceeding;
– 24 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(3) an insurance company while defending an insured through staff
counsel;
(4) an officer of a corporation, an employee designated by an officer of a
corporation, a partner in a business operated as a partnership or an employee designated
by a partner, a member of a limited liability company or an employee designated by a
member of a limited liability company, or an employee designated by the owner of a
business operated as a sole proprietorship while the officer, partner, member, or employee
is appearing on behalf of the corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or
business in a civil action in the District Court of Maryland or an appeal from the District
Court of Maryland if:
(i) the action or appeal:
1. is based on a claim that does not exceed the amount set
under § 4–405 of the Courts Article for a small claim action; and
2. is not based on an assignment, to the corporation,
partnership, or business, of the claim of another;
(ii) in the case of a designated employee, the employee:
1. is not assigned on a full–time basis to appear in the
District Court on behalf of the corporation, partnership, or business;
2. provides the court a power of attorney sworn to by the
employer that certifies that the designated employee is an authorized agent of the
corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or sole proprietorship and may bind the
corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or sole proprietorship on matters
pending before the court; and
3. is not an individual who is disbarred or suspended as a
lawyer in any state; and
(iii) the corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or
business does not contract, hire, or employ another business entity to provide appearance
services;
(5) an individual who is authorized by a county employee to represent the
employee at any step of the county’s grievance procedure; [or]
(6) a director or an officer of a common ownership community while
representing the common ownership community in a dispute, hearing, or other matter
before a board or commission established to oversee one or more of the following common
ownership communities:
– 25 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) a development subject to a declaration enforced by a homeowners
association as defined in § 11B–101 of the Real Property Article;
(ii) a residential condominium as defined in § 11–101 of the Real
Property Article; or
(iii) a cooperative housing corporation as defined in § 5–6B–01 of the
Corporations and Associations Article; OR
(7) AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE LAW IN THE STATE
UNDER § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE. BY THE SUPREME
COURT OF MARYLAND.
10.5–102.
[A] EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, A person may not operate as a land professional in the State
unless the person registers with the Department and is issued a registration certificate
under this title.
11–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Board” means the State Board of Pilots.
(h) “Pilot–in–training” means an individual who is engaged in training, under the
supervision of [a licensed pilot] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PROVIDE PILOTAGE
IN THE STATE, to provide pilotage.
11–306.
Appointment as a pilot–in–training authorizes the individual to engage in training,
under the supervision of [a licensed pilot] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PROVIDE
PILOTAGE IN THE STATE, to provide pilotage.
11–401.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may provide pilotage in the State.
– 26 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(b) An individual may provide pilotage to a vessel in distress until [a licensed
pilot] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PROVIDE PILOTAGE IN THE STATE comes on
board and offers to provide pilotage.
(c) A person who provides pilotage without [a license] BEING AUTHORIZED TO
PROVIDE PILOTAGE IN THE STATE is liable for any damages that result.
12–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Board” means the State Board of Plumbing.
12–301.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board to provide
plumbing services before the individual may provide plumbing services in the State.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board to provide
or to assist in providing plumbing services before the individual may assist in providing
plumbing services in the State.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board to provide
plumbing services or certified by the Board to provide propane gas services before the
individual may provide propane gas services in the State.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board to provide
natural gas services before the individual may provide natural gas services in the State.
13–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(l) “Secretary” means the Secretary of State Police.
13–401.
(a) Except as provided under subsection (b) of this section OR § 10–14A–03 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be certified by the Secretary as
a private detective before the individual personally may provide any private detective
service in the State.
– 27 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) An individual who is not certified as a private detective may provide private
detective services in the State if:
(1) the individual is employed by or has applied for employment with a
licensed private detective agency;
(2) the licensed private detective agency has submitted to the Secretary the
application of the individual for certification as a private detective, fingerprint cards, and
fees required under § 13–403 of this subtitle;
(3) after a preliminary background investigation, the Secretary determines
that the provision of private detective services by the individual would not result in a
potential threat to public safety; and
(4) the Secretary has not denied the application.
14–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Board” means the State Board for Professional Engineers.
14–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice engineering in the State.
15–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board for Professional Land Surveyors.
15–301.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board to practice
land surveying before the individual may practice land surveying in the State.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board to practice
property line surveying before the individual may practice property line surveying in the
State.
– 28 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
16–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(h) “Commission” means the State Commission of Real Estate Appraisers,
Appraisal Management Companies, and Home Inspectors.
(s) “Supervising appraiser” means [a certified residential real estate appraiser or
a certified general real estate appraiser] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PROVIDE
CERTIFIED REAL ESTATE APPRAISAL SERVICES IN THE STATE who has the
responsibility of supervising one or more real estate appraiser trainees.
16–301.
(a) [After June 30, 1991, and except] EXCEPT as otherwise provided in this title
OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be
licensed by the Commission to provide real estate appraisal services before the individual
may provide real estate appraisal services in the State.
16–302.
(d) (2) An applicant shall have completed:
(i) at least 1,000 hours providing real estate appraiser services as a
real estate appraiser trainee under the supervision of [a certified appraiser] AN
INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PROVIDE CERTIFIED REAL ESTATE APPRAISAL
SERVICES IN THE STATE; or
16–3A–01.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Commission as a home
inspector before the individual may provide home inspection services in the State.
16–501.
(a) [After June 30, 1991, and except] EXCEPT as otherwise provided in this title
OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be
certified by the Commission to provide certified real estate appraisal services before the
individual may provide certified real estate appraisal services in the State.
16–503.
(b) (2) An applicant shall have completed:
– 29 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) at least 1,500 hours providing real estate appraiser services as a
real estate appraiser trainee under the supervision of [a certified appraiser] AN
INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PROVIDE CERTIFIED REAL ESTATE APPRAISAL
SERVICES IN THE STATE; or
17–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Commission” means the State Real Estate Commission.
17–301.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Commission as a
real estate broker before the individual may provide real estate brokerage services in the
State.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Commission as an
associate real estate broker or a real estate salesperson before the individual, while acting
on behalf of a real estate broker, may provide real estate brokerage services in the State.
18–301.
Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, a person may not engage, or solicit to engage, in the business of
providing security systems services in the State unless the person obtains a license and
meets the requirements of § 18–401 of this title.
19–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(j) “Secretary”, unless the context requires otherwise, means the Secretary of
State Police.
19–401.
(a) Except as provided under subsection (b) of this section OR § 10–14A–03 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, a licensed security guard agency may provide an
individual for hire as a security guard only if the individual is certified by the Secretary as
a security guard.
20–101.
– 30 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(f) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Public Safety and Correctional Services.
20–301.
[A] EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, A person shall be licensed by the Secretary as a private home
detention monitoring agency before operating a business that provides monitoring services
for a fee to individuals who are under a court order that requires monitoring by a private
home detention monitoring agency.
21–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Individual Tax Preparers.
21–301.
[An] EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, AN individual shall be registered by the Board before the
individual may provide individual tax preparation services in the State.
Article – Business Regulation
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(h) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Labor.
2.5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) (1) “License” means any grant of authority to an individual to practice an
occupation or profession.
(2) “License” includes a certificate, permit, or registration.
(e) “Unit” means a unit in the Department that is authorized to issue a license.
2.5–106.
– 31 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) (1) Each unit shall issue an expedited license to an active service member,
eligible veteran, or eligible spouse who meets the requirements of this section.
(2) If an active service member, eligible veteran, or eligible spouse meets
the requirements for licensure, a unit shall issue the license within 60 days after receiving
a completed application.
(b) An application for a license shall include the following, in the form and
manner required by the unit:
(1) proof that the applicant is an active service member, eligible veteran,
or eligible spouse;
(2) proof that:
(i) the applicant has held a valid license in good standing issued in
another state for at least 1 year; and
(ii) each valid license held by the applicant issued in another state
is in good standing;
(3) if the applicant is an active service member or eligible veteran, proof
that the applicant is assigned to a duty station in the State or has established legal
residence in the State;
(4) if the applicant is an eligible spouse, proof that the applicant’s spouse
is assigned to a duty station in the State or has established legal residence in the State;
(5) if a criminal background check is required by the unit for licensure,
proof of application for a criminal background check;
(6) proof that the applicant has submitted the full application for licensure;
and
(7) payment of any application fee required by the unit.
(C) AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE IN THE STATE UNDER §
10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO
APPLY FOR EXPEDITED LICENSURE UNDER THIS SECTION TO PRACTICE IN THE
STATE.
4–303.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO
PARTICIPATE AS A WRESTLER OR A CONTESTANT OR TO ACT AS A MANAGER,
– 32 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
REFEREE, JUDGE, SECOND, MATCHMAKER, OR PROMOTER IN A CONTEST IN THE
STATE UNDER § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
[(a)] (B) A person may not participate as a wrestler or contestant in a contest in
the State unless the person has an appropriate license.
[(b)] (C) A person may not act as a manager, referee, judge, second,
matchmaker, or promoter in a contest in the State unless the person has an appropriate
license.
4–403.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section OR §
10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual may not act as an
athlete agent in the State without holding a license under § 4–405 of this subtitle.
8–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, a person must have a contractor license whenever the person
acts as a contractor in the State.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, a person must have a salesperson license or contractor license
whenever the person sells a home improvement in the State.
9A–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Heating, Ventilation, Air–Conditioning, and
Refrigeration Contractors.
9A–301.
Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual provides or assists in providing heating, ventilation, air–conditioning, or
refrigeration services in the State.
12–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “Dealer” means:
– 33 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) an individual who acquires commercially from the public or
trades commercially with the public in secondhand precious metal objects;
(ii) an individual who for compensation arranges for the sale or
delivery of a secondhand precious metal object on behalf of a person that does not hold a
license under this title; or
(iii) unless otherwise provided, a pawnbroker.
(2) “Dealer” includes a retail jeweler as to transactions in which the retail
jeweler acquires commercially from the public or trades commercially with the public in
secondhand precious metal objects.
12–201.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall have a license before the individual does
business as a dealer in the State.
(b) Except those pawnbrokers who are exempt from State licensing under §
12–102(c) of this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, all
pawnbrokers must be licensed as dealers.
12.5–201.
Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, a business shall be licensed by the Secretary before the business
and employees of the business provide locksmith services in the State.
17–906.
Except as otherwise provided in Part II of this subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, a person must have a peddler license whenever the
person acts as a peddler in the State.
17–917.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in Part III of this subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, a person must have a peddler license whenever in
Calvert County the person:
(1) sells or offers for sale at wholesale or retail any vegetables, eggs,
poultry, meats, or other farm products; or
– 34 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(2) sells or offers for sale at retail any dry goods or clothing.
(b) [A] EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, A person must have a magazine seller license whenever the
person acts as a nonresident itinerant magazine seller in Calvert County.
17–1005.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, a person must have a junk dealer or scrap metal
processor license whenever the person does business as a junk dealer or scrap metal
processor in the State.
(2) This subsection does not apply to a situation in which:
(i) a nonresident junk dealer or nonresident scrap metal processor
buys junk or scrap metal from a junk dealer or scrap metal processor licensee who is a
resident of the State; or
(ii) the nonresident junk dealer or nonresident scrap metal processor
transports that junk or scrap metal.
(3) If a nonresident junk dealer or nonresident scrap metal processor comes
into the State in a vehicle, the nonresident junk dealer or nonresident scrap metal processor
may not transport from the State in that vehicle any junk or scrap metal bought in the
State unless the nonresident junk dealer or nonresident scrap metal processor holds a junk
dealer or scrap metal processor license.
(b) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, a person must have an agent license whenever the
person acts as an agent in the State.
(2) This subsection does not apply to a salaried employee of a junk dealer
or scrap metal processor licensee.
17–1401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) (1) “Promoter” means a person who:
(i) organizes, operates, produces, or stages an outdoor musical
festival; or
(ii) owns or leases property where an outdoor musical festival is
held.
– 35 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) “Promoter” does not include the State or a political subdivision of the
State.
17–1403.
Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, a person must have a promoter license whenever the person
acts as a promoter in the State.
17–1803.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, a person must have a trader’s license whenever the person:
(1) does business as a trader in the State; or
(2) does business as an exhibitor in the State.
17–20A–01.
In this subtitle:
(1) “transient vendor” means a person who makes sales subject to the sales
and use tax in the State from a motor vehicle or from a roadside or temporary location,
excluding sales from a location that the vendor owns; and
(2) “transient vendor” does not include:
(i) a person whose only activities in the State are the delivery of
goods in interstate commerce into the State from outside the State pursuant to orders that
were solicited or placed by mail or other means;
(ii) a person who hand crafts items for sale at special events,
including fairs, carnivals, art and craft shows, and other festivals and celebrations in the
State;
(iii) an exhibitor, within the meaning of § 17–1801(d) of this title; or
(iv) an individual who sells by catalogue, sample, or brochure for
future delivery and who makes sales to the owner or legal occupant of the premises
pursuant to the invitation of the owner or legal occupant of the premises.
17–20A–02.
– 36 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(a) (1) [Before] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, BEFORE conducting business in the State, a transient vendor
shall obtain a transient vendor’s license.
Article – Education
1–101.
(a) In this article, unless the context requires otherwise, the following words have
the meanings indicated.
(l) “State Board” means the State Board of Education.
(m) “State Superintendent” means the State Superintendent of Schools.
6–101.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Eligible spouse” means the spouse of an active service member
or eligible veteran.
(ii) “Eligible spouse” includes a surviving spouse of:
1. An eligible veteran; or
2. An active service member who died [within 1 year] before
the date on which the application for an educator license is submitted.
(3) [(i)] “Eligible veteran” means a veteran who was discharged from
active duty [within 1 year] before the date on which the application for an educator license
is submitted.
[(ii) “Eligible veteran” does not include a veteran who has been
discharged from active duty for more than 1 year before the application for an educator
license is submitted.]
(b) The State Superintendent shall expedite educator licensure for an active
service member, eligible veteran, or eligible spouse.
(c) To qualify for expedited educator licensure under this section, an active
service member, eligible veteran, or eligible spouse shall:
(1) Submit an application for educator licensure;
– 37 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) Hold a valid educator license or certificate in good standing issued in
another state;
(3) Meet the applicable qualifications for licensure in COMAR
13A.12.01.04 and 05; and
(4) Pay the applicable licensure fee.
(d) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the State Superintendent,
at the request of a local school system, may issue a temporary educator license to an active
service member, eligible veteran, or eligible spouse who holds a valid educator certificate
or license in good standing issued in another state but who does not meet the qualifications
for educator licensure in this State.
(2) A temporary educator license issued under this subsection authorizes
the active service member, eligible veteran, or eligible spouse, for a limited period of time,
as determined by the State Superintendent, to be employed as an educator in the State
while the active service member, eligible veteran, or eligible spouse completes additional
requirements for licensure in this State.
(e) The Department shall publish prominently on its website the process for
obtaining expedited educator licensure under this section.
(F) AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE IN THE STATE UNDER §
10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO
APPLY FOR EXPEDITED LICENSURE UNDER THIS SECTION TO PRACTICE IN THE
STATE.
[(f)] (G) The State Board may adopt regulations to carry out this section
6–126.
(b) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO TEACH IN THE STATE UNDER § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(2) In addition to any other requirements established by the State Board,
to qualify for a certificate in the State, a teacher who graduated from an institution of
higher education in another state or holds a professional license or certificate from another
state shall:
[(1)] (I) Pass an examination of teaching ability within 18 months of
being hired by a local school system;
– 38 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
[(2)] (II) Hold an active National Board Certification from the National
Board for Professional Teaching Standards; or
[(3)] (III) Complete a comprehensive induction program in accordance with
subsection (a)(4) of this section.
6–701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the Professional Standards and Teacher Education Board.
6–704.1.
(a) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PROVIDE SCHOOL COUNSELING IN THE STATE UNDER § 10–14A–03
OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(2) On or before July 1, 2016, the Board shall require a certificate holder
applying for renewal of a certificate as a school counselor to have obtained training in, by a
method determined by the Board, the knowledge and skills required to understand and
respond to the social, emotional, and personal development of students, including
knowledge and skills relating to:
[(1)] (I) The recognition of indicators of mental illness and behavioral
distress, including depression, trauma, violence, youth suicide, and substance abuse; and
[(2)] (II) The identification of professional resources to help students in
crisis.
13–516.
(b) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual may not provide emergency medical
services in the State unless issued a license or certificate by the EMS Board under this
section.
Article – Environment
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Department” means the Department of the Environment.
(n) “Secretary” means the Secretary of the Environment.
– 39 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2–406.
(a) [After July 1, 1990, the] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE owner of an incinerator for the disposal of solid
waste as defined in § 7–201 or § 9–101 of this article may not operate or cause the
incinerator to be operated unless the owner certifies to the Department that any person
operating the incinerator has completed a course of instruction, approved by the
Department, in the proper and safe operation of the incinerator.
8–304.
(a) In this section, “radiation machine” means any device that is capable of
producing radiation.
(c) The Secretary shall adopt rules and regulations to:
(1) Govern the issuance, suspension, and revocation of licenses for
individuals who inspect radiation machines AND INDIVIDUALS AUTHORIZED TO
INSPECT RADIATION MACHINES IN THE STATE UNDER § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE;
(2) Establish inspection procedures and a schedule for the periodic
inspection and certification of radiation machines;
(3) Establish a biennial fee schedule in accordance with § 8–301(b)(1)(iii)
of this subtitle that is sufficient only to cover the costs to the Department of issuing the
certificate and regulating the use of radiation; and
(4) Provide for penalties for the failure to certify radiation machines.
9–228.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO
STORE SCRAP TIRES, HAUL SCRAP TIRES, OR OPERATE A SCRAP TIRE COLLECTION
FACILITY OR A SCRAP TIRE RECYCLER IN THE STATE UNDER § 10–14A–03 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
[(a)] (B) In this section, “approved facility” means a facility located in or outside
of the State for collecting, recycling, or otherwise processing scrap tires that is approved or
licensed by the Department in accordance with regulations adopted by the Department.
[(b)] (C) A person may not store scrap tires in the State unless the person
demonstrates to the satisfaction of the Department that, within 90 days of the time that
the person stores the scrap tires, the scrap tires will be:
– 40 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(1) Returned to the marketplace;
(2) Used as fuel in an approved resource recovery incinerator;
(3) Used as a tire derived fuel in an approved facility; or
(4) Transferred, by means of a scrap tire hauler, to any facility within the
scrap tire recycling system established under subsection (c) of this section.
[(c)] (D) (1) The service shall establish a scrap tire recycling system that
includes scrap tire collection facilities, scrap tire haulers, and in the following order of
priority:
(i) Scrap tire recyclers; and
(ii) 1. An approved resource recovery facility that uses tires as a
fuel substitute; or
2. An approved facility that uses tires as a tire derived fuel.
(2) A person may not incinerate tires except in:
(i) An approved resource recovery facility that uses tires as a fuel
substitute; or
(ii) An approved facility that uses tires as a tire derived fuel.
(3) A facility that processes scrap tires for use as a fuel in an incinerator,
boiler, or resource recovery facility or a facility that burns or incinerates scrap tires may
not be approved or licensed under this subtitle, unless:
(i) There is no reasonable and economically available opportunity to
process the tires and return them to the marketplace for reuse; and
(ii) The burning or incineration meets all federal and State air
quality standards.
[(d)] (E) Scrap tire collection facilities, haulers, or recyclers may be publicly or
privately owned and operated.
[(e)] (F) (1) After consultation with other State agencies, representatives of
the tire industry, and representatives of local government, the service shall place in
operation a scrap tire recycling system:
– 41 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) By January 1, 1993 for any county with a population of 150,000
or more according to the most recent projections by the Department of Planning; and
(ii) By January 1, 1994 for any county with a population of less than
150,000 according to the most recent projections by the Department of Planning.
(2) The service may establish a scrap tire recycling system required under
paragraph (1) of this subsection on a regional basis.
(3) In establishing the scrap tire recycling system, the service:
(i) Shall give preference to existing private or public scrap tire
collection, processing, or recycling programs or facilities that meet the requirements of this
subtitle; and
(ii) May include in–State facilities licensed by the Department as
well as out–of–state facilities approved by the Department.
(4) Each scrap tire recycling system established under this subsection
shall:
(i) Meet all zoning and land use requirements of the county or
municipal corporation in which the system is to be located; and
(ii) Be provided for in the county plan required under § 9–503 of this
title.
[(f)] (G) (1) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph,
after January 1, 1994 scrap tires may not be disposed of in a landfill.
(ii) The Secretary may waive the requirements of subparagraph (i)
of this paragraph under such terms and conditions and for such periods as the Department
considers appropriate if the Department determines that a scrap tire recycling system:
1. Does not exist; or
2. Has insufficient capacity to accommodate the amount of
scrap tires generated in the State.
(2) A person may not dispose of scrap tires except through a licensed scrap
tire hauler or by delivering the tires to an approved facility.
[(g)] (H) (1) (i) The Department shall establish a tire recycling fee to be
imposed on the first sale of a new tire in the State by a tire dealer, including new tires sold
as part of a new or used vehicle, trailer, farm implement, or other similar machinery.
– 42 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(ii) A county, municipal corporation, or any agency of a county or
municipal corporation may not impose any tax, fee, or other charge on the first sale of a
new tire by a tire dealer.
(2) The tire recycling fee:
(i) Shall be set at $1 per tire beginning January 1, 2026;
(ii) Subject to item (iii) of this paragraph, may be adjusted for
inflation every 2 fiscal years based on the Consumer Price Index, as determined by the
Department; and
(iii) May not exceed $2 per tire.
(3) For a sale made by a tire dealer to a person who resells tires, the tire
dealer shall separately state its recycling fees paid by the tire dealer on the invoice or other
document of sale.
(4) (i) Each tire dealer shall:
1. Pay the tire recycling fee; and
2. Complete and submit, under oath, a return and remit the
fees to the Comptroller of the Treasury on or before the 21st day of the month that follows
the month in which the sale was made, and for other periods and on other dates that the
Comptroller specifies by regulation, including periods for which no fees were due.
(ii) For periods beginning after December 31, 2026, a person shall
file a tire recycling fee return electronically.
(5) A tire dealer who timely files a tire recycling fee return and pays the
tire recycling fees due is allowed, for the expense of administering and paying the fee, a
credit equal to 0.6% of the gross amount of tire recycling fees that the tire dealer is to pay
to the Comptroller.
(6) If the amount of the tire recycling fee is separately stated in a retail
sale, the tire recycling fee is not subject to any tax under Title 11 of the Tax – General
Article or Title 13 of the Transportation Article.
(7) At the end of each quarter, the Comptroller shall forward all tire
recycling fees to the Used Tire Cleanup and Recycling Fund, less the costs of
administration.
(8) Except to the extent they are inconsistent with this subsection, the
provisions of Title 13 of the Tax – General Article applicable to the sales and use tax shall
– 43 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
govern the administration, collection, and enforcement of the tire recycling fee under this
subsection.
(9) The Comptroller:
(i) Shall administer the tire recycling fee; and
(ii) May adopt any regulations that are necessary or appropriate to
administer, collect, and enforce the tire recycling fee.
[(h)] (I) Beginning on July 1, 1992, each scrap tire hauler shall:
(1) Be licensed by the Department to transport scrap tires from scrap tire
collection facilities to scrap tire recyclers;
(2) Apply for a scrap tire hauler’s license on a form provided by the
Department; and
(3) Transport each load of scrap tires to the scrap tire recyclers in
accordance with regulations adopted by the Department.
[(i)] (J) Beginning on July 1, 1992, each scrap tire collection facility shall:
(1) If located in the State, be licensed by the Department to receive tires
from a consumer or a scrap tire hauler;
(2) Apply for a license on a form provided by the Department;
(3) Meet all zoning and land use requirements of the county or municipal
corporation in which the tire collection facility is to be located;
(4) Manage scrap tires in accordance with regulations adopted by the
Department;
(5) By means of a scrap tire hauler, transfer scrap tires to:
(i) A scrap tire recycler; or
(ii) Another scrap tire collection facility; and
(6) In accordance with regulations adopted by the Department and on
forms provided by the Department, provide:
(i) The Department with:
1. A record of the destination;
– 44 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
2. The name of the hauler that is registered with the
Department; and
3. The quantity of each shipment of scrap tires; and
(ii) Each hauler with:
1. A record of the destination; and
2. The quantity of each shipment of scrap tires.
[(j)] (K) (1) Beginning on July 1, 1992, a person may not operate as a scrap
tire recycler in the State unless the person is licensed by the Department.
(2) To apply for a license an applicant shall submit:
(i) An application to the Department on the form that the
Department requires; and
(ii) Any document or other information required in regulations
adopted by the Department.
[(k)] (L) (1) The Department shall adopt regulations necessary to administer
the provisions of this section, including:
(i) Minimum standards for the operation, maintenance, monitoring,
reporting, and suspension of each scrap tire recycling system;
(ii) Requisite evidence of financial ability to properly establish,
operate, and maintain a scrap tire recycling system, including the posting of bonds and
other securities; and
(iii) The forfeiture of bonds and other securities for noncompliance
with the requirements of this section or any applicable regulation.
(2) The Department may require the delivery of scrap tires in this State to
1 or more facilities, in the State or outside of the State, designated by the service as part of
the tire recycling system.
(3) A scrap tire hauler or scrap tire collection facility may not transport or
transfer scrap tires to any place other than a facility designated under paragraph (2) of this
subsection.
9–11A–01.
– 45 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of On–Site Wastewater Professionals.
9–11A–15.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection OR §
10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by
the Board in accordance with this subtitle before the individual may provide on–site
wastewater services in the State.
(2) (i) An individual who provides on–site wastewater services in the
State may continue to provide on–site wastewater services until the licensing requirements
are established by the Department by regulation if the individual:
1. Complies with all applicable State and local laws and
regulations;
2. On or before December 31, 2022, pays to the Department
a fee of $150; and
3. Every 2 years thereafter until the Department sets fees in
accordance with § 9–11A–10 of this subtitle, pays to the Department a renewal fee of $150.
(ii) All fees collected by the Department under this paragraph shall
be:
1. Paid into the On–Site Wastewater Professionals Fund
established under § 9–11A–11 of this subtitle; and
2. Used by the Department to:
A. Pay for the creation of the Board;
B. Cover reasonable administrative costs; and
C. Implement the provisions of this subtitle.
12–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Waterworks and Waste Systems Operators.
12–301.
– 46 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be certified by the Board in an appropriate
classification before a waterworks, wastewater works, or industrial wastewater works may
employ the individual as:
(1) A superintendent; or
(2) An operator or industrial operator in a job function determined by the
Secretary.
13–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Well Drillers.
13–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, a person shall be licensed by the Board before the person may
practice well drilling in this State.
15–807.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, a person may not engage in surface mining within the State
without first obtaining a surface mining license.
17–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the Marine Contractors Licensing Board.
17–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, a person shall be licensed by the Board as a marine contractor
or be employed by an individual or entity that is licensed as a marine contractor before the
person may:
(1) Perform marine contractor services in the State; or
(2) Solicit to perform marine contractor services in the State.
Article – Financial Institutions
– 47 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1–101.
(a) In this article, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following
words have the meanings indicated.
(g) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Financial Regulation in the
Maryland Department of Labor.
11–403.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, a person may not engage in business as a sales finance company
unless the person is licensed by the Commissioner.
11–612.2.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Active service member” has the meaning stated in § 9–901 of the State
Government Article.
(3) (i) “Eligible spouse” means the spouse of an active service member
or eligible veteran.
(ii) “Eligible spouse” includes a surviving spouse of:
1. An eligible veteran; or
2. An active service member who died [within 1 year] before
the date on which the license application, renewal, or change of status is submitted.
(4) [(i)] “Eligible veteran” means a veteran who was discharged from
active duty [within 1 year] before the date on which the license application, renewal, or
change of status is submitted.
[(ii) “Eligible veteran” does not include a veteran who has been
discharged from active duty for more than 1 year before the license application, renewal,
or change of status is submitted.]
(b) To expedite the renewal or change of status of a license for an active service
member, eligible veteran, or eligible spouse, the Commissioner may waive or suspend any
licensing requirements to the extent that the waiver or suspension does not result in the
failure to meet the minimum licensing standards set forth in 12 U.S.C. Chapter 51 and the
regulations adopted under it.
– 48 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(c) To expedite the issuance of a license to an active service member, eligible
veteran, or eligible spouse who holds a valid mortgage loan originator license in another
state, the Commissioner may waive or suspend any licensing requirements to the extent
that the waiver or suspension does not result in the failure to meet the minimum licensing
standards set forth in 12 U.S.C. Chapter 51 and the regulations adopted under it.
(D) AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE IN THE STATE UNDER §
10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO
APPLY FOR EXPEDITED LICENSURE UNDER THIS SECTION TO PRACTICE IN THE
STATE.
[(d)] (E) The Commissioner shall publish prominently on the Commissioner’s
website, or have published on a third–party website used for licensing mortgage loan
originators in the State, the expedited processes for the issuance, renewal, or change of
status of a license under this section.
[(e)] (F) The Commissioner may adopt regulations to carry out this section.
12–405.
(a) A person may not engage in the business of money transmission if that person,
or the person with whom that person engages in the business of money transmission, is
located in the State unless that person:
(1) Is licensed by the Commissioner;
(2) Is an authorized delegate of a licensee under whose name the business
of money transmission occurs; or
(3) Is a person exempted from licensing under this subtitle OR §
10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
Article – Health – General
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(k) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Health.
17–205.
(a) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, A person shall hold a license issued by the Secretary before the person may:
– 49 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) Offer or perform medical laboratory tests or examinations in this State;
(2) Offer or perform medical laboratory tests or examinations on specimens
acquired from health care providers in this State at a medical laboratory located outside
this State; or
(3) Represent or service in this State a medical laboratory regardless of the
laboratory’s location.
17–305.
[A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, A person shall hold a permit issued by the Secretary before the person may:
(1) Operate a tissue bank in this State; or
(2) Represent or service in this State any tissue bank that is outside this
State.
Article – Health Occupations
1–701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Active service member” has the meaning stated in § 9–901 of the State
Government Article.
(c) (1) “Eligible spouse” means the spouse of an active service member or
eligible veteran.
(2) “Eligible spouse” includes a surviving spouse of:
(i) An eligible veteran; or
(ii) An active service member who died [within 1 year] before the
date on which the application for a license, certificate, or registration is submitted.
(d) [(1)] “Eligible veteran” means a veteran who was discharged from active
duty [within 1 year] before the date on which the application for a license, certificate, or
registration is submitted.
[(2) “Eligible veteran” does not include a veteran who has been discharged
from active duty for more than 1 year before the application for a license, certificate, or
registration is submitted.]
– 50 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(e) “Health occupations board” means a board authorized to issue a license,
certificate, or registration under this article.
1–704.
(a) (1) Each health occupations board shall develop a procedure by which an
individual who applies for a license, certificate, or registration can notify the board that the
individual is an active service member, eligible veteran, or eligible spouse.
(2) A health occupations board may satisfy the requirement of paragraph
(1) of this subsection by including a check–off box on a license, certificate, or registration
application form.
(b) For each applicant who is an active service member, eligible veteran, or
eligible spouse, a health occupations board shall assign to the applicant an advisor to assist
the individual with the application process.
(c) (1) Each health occupations board shall expedite the process for the
licensure, certification, or registration of an active service member, eligible veteran, or
eligible spouse.
(2) If an active service member, eligible veteran, or eligible spouse meets
the requirements for licensure, certification, or registration, a health occupations board
shall issue the license, certificate, or registration within 15 business days after receiving a
completed application.
(d) If a health occupations board determines that an active service member,
eligible veteran, or eligible spouse does not meet the education, training, or experience
requirements for licensure, certification, or registration, a representative of the board shall
assist the active service member, eligible veteran, or eligible spouse in identifying:
(1) Programs that offer relevant education or training; or
(2) Ways of obtaining needed experience.
(E) AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE IN THE STATE UNDER §
10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO
APPLY FOR EXPEDITED LICENSURE UNDER THIS SECTION TO PRACTICE IN THE
STATE.
1A–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Board” means the State Acupuncture Board.
– 51 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1A–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice acupuncture in this State.
2–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b–1) “Audiology assistant” means an individual who:
(1) Meets the minimum qualifications established under this subtitle and
in regulations adopted by the Board;
(2) Does not work independently; and
(3) Works under the general supervision of an [audiologist licensed under
this title] INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AUDIOLOGY IN THE STATE.
(c) “Board” means the State Board of Examiners for Audiologists, Hearing Aid
Dispensers, Speech–Language Pathologists, and Music Therapists.
(d) “Direct supervision” means on–site and personal oversight by an individual
[licensed under this title] AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE IN THE STATE who assumes
responsibility for another individual’s conduct whether it is consistent or fails to be
consistent with professional standards and the provisions of this title.
(d–1) “General supervision” means the supervision of [a licensed audiology
assistant] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO ASSIST IN THE PRACTICE OF AUDIOLOGY
IN THE STATE by [a licensed audiologist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE
AUDIOLOGY IN THE STATE who may or may not be present when the [licensed audiology
assistant] INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO ASSIST IN THE PRACTICE OF AUDIOLOGY IN
THE STATE assists in the practice of audiology.
(g) “Hearing aid dispenser supervisor” means [a licensed hearing aid dispenser
or licensed audiologist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE HEARING AID
DISPENSING OR AUDIOLOGY IN THE STATE who supervises a limited licensee who is
studying hearing aid dispensing for the purpose of becoming eligible to sit for the licensure
examination.
(k–1) “Licensed audiology assistant” means, unless the context requires otherwise,
an audiology assistant who is licensed by the Board to assist [a licensed audiologist] AN
– 52 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AUDIOLOGY IN THE STATE in the practice of
audiology.
(n) “Licensed speech–language pathology assistant” means, unless the context
requires otherwise, a speech–language pathology assistant who is licensed by the Board to
assist [a licensed speech–language pathologist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO
PRACTICE SPEECH–LANGUAGE PATHOLOGY IN THE STATE in the practice of
speech–language pathology
(t) “Speech–language pathology assistant” means an individual who:
(1) Meets the minimum qualifications established by the Board that shall
be less stringent than those established by this title to license speech–language
pathologists;
(2) Does not work independently; and
(3) Works under the direct supervision of [a speech–language pathologist
licensed under this title] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE
SPEECH–LANGUAGE PATHOLOGY IN THE STATE.
2–301.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this title, an individual shall be
licensed by the Board before the individual may practice audiology, hearing aid dispensing,
speech–language pathology, or music therapy, or assist in the practice of speech–language
pathology or audiology in this State.
(2) On or after October 1, 2007, an individual hired by a Maryland local
public school system, State–approved nonpublic school for handicapped children, or
chartered educational institution of the State to practice speech–language pathology or
assist in the practice of speech–language pathology, shall be licensed by the Board.
(b) (1) This section does not apply:
(i) To an individual employed by any agency of the federal
government performing the duties of that employment;
(ii) To an individual continuously employed to practice audiology
since June 30, 1988, by a county public school system, a State–approved nonpublic school
for handicapped children, a chartered institution of the State, or the State Department of
Education while performing the duties of that employment;
(iii) To an individual employed by a Maryland local public school
system, State–approved nonpublic school for handicapped children, or chartered
educational institution of the State or the State Department of Education to practice
– 53 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
speech–language pathology continuously since on or before September 30, 2007, while
performing the duties of that employment;
(iv) To a student or trainee in audiology or speech–language
pathology while pursuing a supervised course of study at an accredited university or college
or a recognized training center while the student is obtaining clinical practicum hours;
(v) To a volunteer while working in free speech and hearing
screening programs; [or]
(vi) To an individual licensed to practice audiology or
speech–language pathology in another state or a foreign country while the individual:
1. Provides a clinical demonstration at a training or an
educational event in the State; or
2. Receives clinical training at a training or an educational
event in the State; OR
(VII) TO AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AUDIOLOGY,
HEARING AID DISPENSING, SPEECH–LANGUAGE PATHOLOGY, OR MUSIC THERAPY,
OR TO ASSIST IN THE PRACTICE OF SPEECH–LANGUAGE PATHOLOGY OR AUDIOLOGY
IN THE STATE UNDER § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(2) The Board may allow an audiologist, hearing aid dispenser,
speech–language pathologist, music therapist, speech–language pathology assistant, or
audiology assistant licensed in another state to practice audiology, hearing aid dispensing,
speech–language pathology, or music therapy, or assist in the practice of speech–language
pathology or audiology in this State without a license if the applicant has:
(i) Been granted preliminary approval by the Board to practice; and
(ii) A completed application for a license pending before the Board.
2–310.1.
(c) While a limited license to practice hearing aid dispensing is in effect, it
authorizes the holder to practice hearing aid dispensing only while being trained under the
supervision of [a licensed hearing aid dispenser or a licensed audiologist] AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE HEARING AID DISPENSING OR AUDIOLOGY IN THE
STATE.
2–310.2.
– 54 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(b) (2) While it is effective, a limited license to practice speech–language
pathology authorizes the licensee to practice speech–language pathology under the
supervision of:
(i) [A fully licensed speech–language pathologist] AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO FULLY PRACTICE SPEECH–LANGUAGE PATHOLOGY IN THE STATE;
or
(ii) If the individual is employed in a setting in which licensure is not
required as provided under § 2–301(b)(1)(i) of this subtitle, an individual who holds national
certification in speech–language pathology from a professional organization acceptable to
the Board as provided for in the regulations adopted by the Board.
2–310.3.
(b) (2) While it is effective, a limited license to assist in the practice of
speech–language pathology authorizes the licensee to assist in the practice of
speech–language pathology under the direct supervision of:
(i) [A fully licensed speech–language pathologist] AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO FULLY PRACTICE SPEECH–LANGUAGE PATHOLOGY IN THE STATE;
or
(ii) If the individual is employed in a setting in which licensure is not
required as provided under § 2–301(b)(1)(i) of this subtitle, an individual who holds national
certification in speech–language pathology from a professional organization as provided for
in the regulations adopted by the Board.
2–3B–01.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title[,on or after October 1, 2022,] OR §
10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by
the Board before the individual may assist [a licensed audiologist] AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AUDIOLOGY IN THE STATE in the practice of audiology in
this State.
2–3B–04.
A license to assist in the practice of audiology authorizes the licensed individual to
assist [a licensed audiologist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AUDIOLOGY
IN THE STATE in the practice of audiology while the license is effective.
2–3B–06.
– 55 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) [A licensed audiology assistant] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO ASSIST
IN THE PRACTICE OF AUDIOLOGY IN THE STATE shall assist the practice of audiology
under the general supervision of [a licensed audiologist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED
TO PRACTICE AUDIOLOGY IN THE STATE.
(b) [A licensed audiologist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE
AUDIOLOGY IN THE STATE may provide general supervision for not more than two
[licensed audiology assistants] INDIVIDUALS AUTHORIZED TO ASSIST IN THE PRACTICE
OF AUDIOLOGY IN THE STATE at any time.
3–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners.
3–301.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice chiropractic in this State.
3–305.1.
(a) The Board may grant a temporary license to an individual who meets the
requirements of this section.
(b) To qualify for a temporary license, an applicant shall:
(1) Submit an application provided by the Board;
(2) Have graduated from an accredited chiropractic program of study;
(3) Have begun the process of applying to the Board for a license to practice
chiropractic, but not met requirements to qualify for a license;
(4) (i) Have been licensed in another state for at least 2 years preceding
the application in the State; or
(ii) Have graduated from an accredited chiropractic program of
study within 6 months preceding the application in the State;
(5) Have submitted written, verified evidence that the applicant has
submitted a criminal history records check in accordance with § 3–302.1 of this subtitle;
– 56 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(6) Agree to practice under the direct supervision of a Board–approved
supervisor who is [a licensed chiropractor] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE
CHIROPRACTIC IN THE STATE while the temporary license is in effect; and
(7) Pay the temporary license fee set by the Board.
4–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Dental Examiners.
4–301.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board to practice
dentistry before the individual may practice dentistry on a human being in this State.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board to practice
dental hygiene before the individual may practice dental hygiene on a human being in this
State.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(5) A dental assistant, if the dental assistant:
(ii) Performs intraoral procedures in accordance with § 4–301.1 of
this subtitle only under the direct supervision of [a licensed dentist] AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE DENTISTRY IN THE STATE who personally is present in the
office area where the procedures are performed; or
4–301.1.
(a) (1) A dental assistant may assist [a licensed dentist] AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE DENTISTRY IN THE STATE in providing the following
intraoral procedures under the direct supervision of a licensed dentist without being
certified by the Board:
(i) Rinsing and aspiration of the oral cavity;
(ii) Retraction of the lips, cheeks, tongue, and flaps;
(iii) Placement and removal of materials for the isolation of the
dentition, provided that the material is not retained by the dentition;
– 57 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iv) Instructing on oral hygiene;
(v) Taking impressions for study models or diagnostic casts;
(vi) Constructing athletic mouth guards on models;
(vii) Applying topical anesthesia;
(viii) Curing by the use of halogen light;
(ix) Checking for loose bands; and
(x) Any other procedure that the Board authorizes by a rule or
regulation.
(2) A dental assistant may assist in performing intraoral photography,
other than conventional or digital X–ray, under the general supervision of a licensed dentist
who reviews the photography and authorizes the treatment plan without being certified by
the Board.
(b) (1) Except for an individual [licensed as a dentist or a dental hygienist
under this title] AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE DENTISTRY OR DENTAL HYGIENE IN THE
STATE, an individual shall be certified by the Board as an expanded function dental
assistant authorized to perform at least one of the following intraoral procedures before the
individual may perform the intraoral procedure in the State:
(i) Assisting in orthodontic procedures authorized by the Board in
regulation;
(ii) Placing dental sealants;
(iii) Coronal polishing only to remove stain or biofilm:
1. In connection with a dental prophylaxis:
A. As determined necessary and appropriate, secondary to
the more complex dental procedures of a dental prophylaxis, such as removal of hard and
soft deposits and stain of the tooth crown, root surfaces, and periodontal pocket; and
B. If applicable, in consultation with the treating dental
hygienist; or
2. Before a dentist performs an esthetic or cementation
procedure;
(iv) Applying silver diamine fluoride;
– 58 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(v) Monitoring nitrous oxide by observing a patient:
1. During the flow of nitrous oxide;
2. During the reduction of the flow of nitrous oxide;
3. During the shutting off of equipment controlling the flow
of nitrous oxide; and
4. At all times in between the start of the flow of nitrous
oxide until the nitrous oxide has been terminated and the patient has fully awoken and is
coherent; or
(vi) Additional intraoral procedures authorized by the Board in
regulations.
4–505.
(c) [After July 1, 1988] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual must be certified by the Board as a dental
radiation technologist before a licensed dentist may employ the individual to practice
dental radiation technology.
(d) [After July 1, 1988] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual may not practice dental radiation technology
unless certified by the Board.
5–101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Dietetic Practice.
(j) “Supervision” means the management of an individual who aids in the
practice of dietetics by [a licensed dietitian–nutritionist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED
TO PRACTICE DIETETICS IN THE STATE who may or may not be on the premises.
5–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice dietetics in the State.
(b) The following individuals may practice dietetics without a license:
– 59 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) A student or trainee, working under the supervision of [a licensed
dietitian–nutritionist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE DIETETICS IN THE
STATE while fulfilling an experience requirement or pursuing a course of study to meet
requirements for licensure, for a limited period of time as determined by the Board;
(2) An individual employed by the United States government to practice
dietetics, while practicing within the scope of that employment; and
(3) An individual who aids in the practice of dietetics, if the individual
works under the supervision of [a licensed dietitian–nutritionist or licensed physician] AN
INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE DIETETICS OR MEDICINE IN THE STATE.
6–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Massage Therapy Examiners.
6–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, before an individual may practice massage therapy in the State,
the individual shall be:
(1) On or before October 31, 2026:
(i) Licensed by the Board; or
(ii) Registered by the Board to practice massage therapy in a setting
that is not a health care setting; or
(2) On or after November 1, 2026, licensed by the Board.
7–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Apprentice” means an individual licensed by the Board who assists [a
licensed mortician or funeral director] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE
MORTUARY SCIENCE OR FUNERAL DIRECTION IN THE STATE in the practice of
mortuary science or funeral direction, under direct supervision of [a licensed mortician or
funeral director] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE MORTUARY SCIENCE OR
FUNERAL DIRECTION IN THE STATE.
(c) “Apprentice sponsor” means an individual who:
– 60 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(1) Is [a licensed mortician or funeral director whose license is in good
standing with the Board] AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE MORTUARY SCIENCE OR
FUNERAL DIRECTION IN THE STATE;
(2) Has practiced mortuary science as [a licensed mortician or funeral
director] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE MORTUARY SCIENCE OR
FUNERAL DIRECTION in Maryland at least 1 year immediately prior to accepting the
applicant as an apprentice; and
(3) Provides direct supervision to an apprentice.
(d) “Board” means the State Board of Morticians and Funeral Directors.
7–301.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice mortuary science in this State.
7–302.
(a) (1) [An] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, AN individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice mortuary science in this State.
(2) A mortician license issued under this title authorizes the licensee to
practice mortuary science while the license is effective.
(b) (1) [An] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, AN individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice funeral direction in this State.
(2) A funeral director license issued under this title authorizes the licensee
to practice funeral direction while the license is effective.
7–306.
(b) (1) A mortician apprentice shall have an apprentice sponsor who:
(i) Is [a licensed mortician whose license is in good standing with
the Board] AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE MORTUARY SCIENCE IN THE STATE; and
(ii) Is employed by the same funeral establishment that employs the
apprentice.
– 61 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) A funeral director apprentice shall have an apprentice sponsor who:
(i) Is [a licensed mortician or funeral director whose license is in
good standing with the Board] AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE MORTUARY SCIENCE OR
FUNERAL DIRECTION IN THE STATE; and
(ii) Is employed by the same funeral establishment that employs the
apprentice.
(3) An apprentice may have more than one apprentice sponsor.
(d) (2) The applicant and [a licensed mortician or licensed funeral director] AN
INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE MORTUARY SCIENCE OR FUNERAL
DIRECTION IN THE STATE shall appear before the Board to seek the Board’s approval for
an apprentice license for the applicant.
(e) (3) For purposes of paragraph (1)(iii) of this subsection, direct supervision
may include instruction by [a licensed mortician or funeral director] AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE MORTUARY SCIENCE OR FUNERAL DIRECTION IN THE
STATE employed or supervised by the apprentice sponsor that is observed in person by the
apprentice sponsor.
(f) While the license is effective, an apprentice license authorizes the licensee to
assist [a licensed mortician or funeral director] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO
PRACTICE MORTUARY SCIENCE OR FUNERAL DIRECTION IN THE STATE in the practice
of mortuary science or funeral direction only as part of a training program to become a
licensed mortician or funeral director.
7–308.
(a) Subject to the provisions of this section, the Board shall issue a surviving
spouse license to an applicant if the applicant:
(1) Is the surviving spouse of a licensed mortician or licensed funeral
director whose license was in good standing at the time of death and who at the time of
death was operating and wholly or partly owned a mortuary science business;
(2) Is not a licensed mortician or licensed funeral director;
(3) Submits to the Board, within 30 days of the death of the licensed
mortician or funeral director, written verification of the death of the licensee and the
application required by the Board; and
(4) Pays a fee set by the Board.
– 62 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(e) The Board may issue a license under this section only if:
(1) The business is operated under the direct supervision of [a licensed
mortician or funeral director] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE MORTUARY
SCIENCE OR FUNERAL DIRECTION IN THE STATE; and
(2) The embalming is done by [a licensed mortician] AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE MORTUARY SCIENCE IN THE STATE.
7–308.1.
(a) A personal representative of a deceased mortician’s, funeral director’s, or
surviving spouse’s estate shall be licensed by the Board before continuing operation of the
mortuary science business.
(e) The Board may issue a license under this section only if:
(1) The business is operated under the direct supervision of [a licensed
mortician or funeral director] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE MORTUARY
SCIENCE OR FUNERAL DIRECTION IN THE STATE; and
(2) The embalming services are provided by [a licensed mortician] AN
INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE MORTUARY SCIENCE IN THE STATE.
8–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Board” means the State Board of Nursing.
(j) “Mentor” means [a certified registered nurse practitioner or a licensed
physician] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE REGISTERED NURSING OR
MEDICINE IN THE STATE:
(1) Who has 3 or more years of clinical practice experience; and
(2) With whom an individual applying for certification as a certified nurse
practitioner will consult and collaborate with as needed in accordance with § 8–302.1(d) of
this title.
8–301.
– 63 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice registered nursing in this State.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice licensed practical nursing in this State.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be certified as an advanced practice
registered nurse before the individual may practice advanced practice registered nursing
in this State.
8–6A–02.
(a) Subject to subsection (f) of this section and except as otherwise provided in
this subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual
shall be certified by the Board to practice as a nursing assistant, dialysis technician, or
medication technician before the individual may practice as a nursing assistant, dialysis
technician, or medication technician in the State.
(f) [An] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, AN individual shall be certified by the Board to practice as a
nursing assistant and as a dialysis technician before the individual may practice as a
dialysis technician in a State–owned hospital or State–owned facility.
8–6B–07.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice electrology or teach an electrology education program in the State.
8–6C–06.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice direct–entry midwifery in the State.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(1) An individual who assists at a birth in an emergency;
(2) An individual who is [licensed as a health care practitioner whose scope
of practice allows the individual to practice direct–entry midwifery] AUTHORIZED TO
– 64 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
PRACTICE AS A HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER IN THE STATE WHOSE SCOPE OF
PRACTICE ALLOWS THE INDIVIDUAL TO PRACTICE DIRECT–ENTRY MIDWIFERY; or
(3) A student who is practicing direct–entry midwifery while engaged in an
approved clinical midwife educational experience under the supervision of [a licensed
direct–entry midwife] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE DIRECT–ENTRY
MIDWIFERY IN THE STATE.
8–6D–02.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice certified midwifery in the State.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(1) An individual who assists at a birth in an emergency;
(2) An individual who is [licensed as a health care practitioner]
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS A HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER IN THE STATE whose
scope of practice allows the individual to practice certified midwifery;
(3) A student who is practicing certified midwifery while engaged in an
approved clinical midwifery education experience under the supervision of [a licensed
certified midwife or a licensed nurse certified as a nurse–midwife] AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE DIRECT–ENTRY MIDWIFERY OR NURSING AS A
NURSE–MIDWIFE IN THE STATE; or
(4) An individual who has graduated from a graduate level accredited
program for midwifery education approved by ACME, and who is:
(i) Practicing certified midwifery under the supervision of [a
licensed certified midwife or a licensed nurse certified as a nurse–midwife] AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE DIRECT–ENTRY MIDWIFERY OR NURSING AS A
NURSE–MIDWIFE IN THE STATE; and
(ii) Meets any other requirements set by the Board.
9–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Board” means the State Board of Long–Term Care Administrators.
9–301.
– 65 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice as a nursing home administrator in this State.
9–3A–01.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, beginning July 1, 2026, an individual must be licensed by the
Board before the individual may practice as an assisted living manager in the State.
9–404.
Except when a nursing home administrator is removed from the position by death or
for any other unexpected cause as provided in § 9–301 of this title, a nursing home may not
be operated unless it is under the supervision of [a licensed nursing home administrator]
AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS A NURSING HOME ADMINISTRATOR IN
THE STATE.
10–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Board” means the State Board of Occupational Therapy Practice.
(i) (1) “Limited occupational therapy” means participation, while under the
periodic supervision of [a licensed occupational therapist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED
TO PRACTICE OCCUPATIONAL THERAPY IN THE STATE, in:
(i) An initial screening and evaluation that applies the principles
and procedures of occupational therapy; and
(ii) A treatment program that applies the principles and procedures
of occupational therapy.
(r) (1) “Periodic supervision” means supervision by [a licensed occupational
therapist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE OCCUPATIONAL THERAPY IN
THE STATE on a face–to–face basis, occurring the earlier of at least:
(i) Once every 10 therapy visits; or
(ii) Once every 30 calendar days.
10–301.
– 66 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice occupational therapy or limited occupational therapy in this State.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(3) Subject to the regulations adopted by the Board, an aide who supports
the practice of occupational therapy or the practice of limited occupational therapy, if the
aide:
(i) Works only under the direct supervision of [a licensed
occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED
TO PRACTICE OCCUPATIONAL THERAPY OR ASSIST IN THE PRACTICE OF
OCCUPATIONAL THERAPY IN THE STATE and subject to the occupational therapist’s
responsibility for supervision, as provided by this subtitle; and
(ii) Performs only support activities that do not require training in
the basic anatomical, biological, psychological, and social sciences used in the practice of
occupational therapy;
11–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Examiners in Optometry.
11–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice optometry in this State.
(b) This section does not apply to a student while participating in a residency
training program under the direct supervision of [a licensed optometrist] AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE OPTOMETRY IN THE STATE.
11–404.1.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED
PRACTICE OPTOMETRY IN THE STATE UNDER § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
[(a)] (B) Unless certified under this section, a licensed optometrist may not
administer or prescribe any therapeutic pharmaceutical agents or remove superficial
foreign bodies from a human eye, adnexa, or lacrimal system.
– 67 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(b)] (C) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Board
shall certify a licensed optometrist as a therapeutically certified optometrist if the licensed
optometrist submits to the Board evidence satisfactory to the Board that the licensed
optometrist:
(i) Has successfully completed at least 110 hours of a therapeutic
pharmaceutical agents course approved by the Board;
(ii) Has successfully passed a pharmacology examination relating to
the treatment and management of ocular disease, which is prepared, administered, and
graded by the National Board of Examiners in Optometry or any other nationally
recognized optometric organization as approved by the Secretary;
(iii) Is currently certified by the Board to administer topical ocular
diagnostic pharmaceutical agents under § 11–404 of this subtitle; and
(iv) Has successfully completed an 8–hour course in the management
of topical steroids approved by the Board.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, an
optometrist who has graduated on or after July 1, 2005 from an accredited school of
optometry recognized by the Board is not subject to the requirements of paragraph (1) of
this subsection.
(ii) If an optometrist who has graduated on or after July 1, 2005 from
an accredited school of optometry recognized by the Board is not certified under this section
within 3 years of graduation, the optometrist shall successfully complete a therapeutic
pharmaceutical agents course and successfully pass a pharmacology exam under paragraph
(1) of this subsection before the Board may certify the optometrist.
12–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Board” means the State Board of Pharmacy.
(i) “Direct supervision” means that [a licensed pharmacist] AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE PHARMACY IN THE STATE is physically available,
notwithstanding appropriate breaks, on–site and in the prescription area or in an area
where pharmacy services are provided to supervise the practice of pharmacy and delegated
pharmacy acts.
12–301.
– 68 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice pharmacy in this State.
(b) This section does not apply to a pharmacy student participating in an
experiential learning program of a college or school of pharmacy under the supervision of
[a licensed pharmacist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE PHARMACY IN THE
STATE.
(c) This section does not apply to a registered pharmacy intern practicing under
the direct supervision of [a licensed pharmacist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO
PRACTICE PHARMACY IN THE STATE.
12–502.
(a) In the operation of a pharmacy, only [a licensed pharmacist] AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE PHARMACY IN THE STATE or an individual engaging in a
professional experience program and acting under the direct supervision of [a licensed
pharmacist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE PHARMACY IN THE STATE
may provide information to the public or a health care practitioner concerning prescription
or nonprescription drugs or devices including information as to their therapeutic values,
potential side effects, and use in the treatment and prevention of diseases.
12–6B–01.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be registered and approved by the Board as
a pharmacy technician before the individual may perform delegated pharmacy acts.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(1) A pharmacy technician trainee under the direct supervision of [a
licensed pharmacist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE PHARMACY IN THE
STATE provided that the individual does not perform delegated pharmacy acts for more
than 6 months; or
(2) A pharmacy student who:
(i) Is currently completing the first year of a professional pharmacy
education program; and
(ii) Under the direct supervision of a licensed pharmacist, performs
delegated pharmacy acts in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board.
12–6D–02.
– 69 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be registered and approved by the Board as
a registered pharmacy intern before the individual may practice pharmacy under the direct
supervision of [a licensed pharmacist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE
PHARMACY IN THE STATE in accordance with this subtitle.
12–6D–08.
(a) Registration authorizes a registered pharmacy intern to practice pharmacy
under the direct supervision of [a licensed pharmacist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO
PRACTICE PHARMACY IN THE STATE while the registration is effective.
12–6D–10.
(a) Each registered pharmacy intern shall:
(1) Display the pharmacy intern’s registration in the office or place of
business in which the pharmacy intern is practicing pharmacy under the direct supervision
of [a licensed pharmacist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE PHARMACY IN
THE STATE; or
(2) Have the registration on the pharmacy intern’s person available for
viewing.
(b) When practicing pharmacy under the direct supervision of [a licensed
pharmacist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE PHARMACY IN THE STATE,
the registered pharmacy intern shall wear identification that conspicuously identifies the
registered pharmacy intern as a registered pharmacy intern.
12–6D–11.
Subject to the hearing provision of § 12–315 of this title, the Board may deny a
pharmacy intern’s registration to any applicant, reprimand a registered pharmacy intern,
place any pharmacy intern’s registration on probation, or suspend or revoke a pharmacy
intern’s registration if the applicant or pharmacy intern registrant:
(2) Practices pharmacy without the direct supervision of [a licensed
pharmacist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE PHARMACY IN THE STATE;
13–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Physical Therapy Examiners.
– 70 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(b–1) “Direct supervision” means supervision provided by [a licensed physical
therapist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE PHYSICAL THERAPY IN THE
STATE who is physically present within the treatment area and immediately available to
give aid, direction, and instruction when physical therapy or limited physical therapy
procedures or activities are performed.
13–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice physical therapy or limited physical therapy in this State.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(1) A student who is supervised directly by [a licensed physical therapist]
AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE PHYSICAL THERAPY IN THE STATE in a
Board approved physical therapy educational program; or
(2) A physical therapy aide, if the physical therapy aide:
(i) Subject to the rules and regulations adopted by the Board,
performs only procedures that do not require the professional skills of a licensed physical
therapist or a licensed physical therapist assistant; and
(ii) Performs procedures only under the direct supervision of [a
licensed physical therapist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE PHYSICAL
THERAPY IN THE STATE who personally is present in the area where the procedures are
performed.
13–310.
(b) A licensed physical therapist assistant may practice limited physical therapy
only under the direction of [a licensed physical therapist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED
TO PRACTICE PHYSICAL THERAPY IN THE STATE who gives ongoing supervision and
instruction that is adequate to ensure the safety and welfare of the patient.
13–404.
Unless under the direction of [a licensed physical therapist] AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE PHYSICAL THERAPY IN THE STATE, a physical therapist
assistant may not practice limited physical therapy.
14–101.
– 71 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Physicians.
(p) “Registered cardiovascular invasive specialist” means an individual who is
credentialed by Cardiovascular Credentialing International or another credentialing body
approved by the Board to assist in cardiac catheterization procedures in a hospital under
the direct, in–person supervision of [a licensed physician] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED
TO PRACTICE MEDICINE IN THE STATE.
14–301.
Except as otherwise provided in this title [or], § 13–516 of the Education Article, OR
§ 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed
by the Board before the individual may practice medicine in this State.
14–302.
Subject to the rules, regulations, and orders of the Board, the following individuals
may practice medicine without a license:
(5) An individual while under the supervision of [a licensed physician] AN
INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE MEDICINE IN THE STATE who has specialty
training in psychiatry, and whose specialty training in psychiatry has been approved by
the Board, if the individual submits an application to the Board on or before October 1,
1993, and either:
(i) 1. Has a master’s degree from an accredited college or
university; and
2. Has completed a graduate program accepted by the Board
in a behavioral science that includes 1,000 hours of supervised clinical psychotherapy
experience; or
(ii) 1. Has a baccalaureate degree from an accredited college or
university; and
2. Has 4,000 hours of supervised clinical experience that is
approved by the Board.
14–306.
(e) Except as otherwise provided in this section and in accordance with
regulations adopted by the Board, an individual may perform X–ray duties without a
license only if the duties:
– 72 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(3) Are performed:
(i) In the physician’s office under the supervision of [a licensed
physician or radiologic technologist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE
MEDICINE OR RADIOLOGIC TECHNOLOGY IN THE STATE who is on–site or able to
provide immediately available direction; and
(ii) 2. By [a licensed physician assistant] AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO ASSIST IN THE PRACTICE OF MEDICINE IN THE STATE who has
completed a course that includes anterior–posterior and lateral radiographic studies of
extremities on at least 20 separate patients under the direct supervision of the delegating
physician or radiologist using a mini C–arm or similar low–level radiation machine to
perform nonfluoroscopic X–ray procedures, if the duties:
A. Include only the X–ray procedures described in paragraph
(2)(iii) of this subsection; and
B. Are performed pursuant to a Board–approved delegation
agreement that includes a request to perform advanced duties under § 15–302(c)(2) of this
article.
14–5A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(i) “Supervision” means the responsibility of a physician to exercise on–site or
immediately available direction for [a licensed respiratory care practitioner] AN
INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE RESPIRATORY CARE IN THE STATE
performing delegated medical acts.
14–5A–08.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice respiratory care in this State.
14–5B–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(j) “Licensed radiologist assistant” means an individual who is licensed to
practice radiology assistance under the supervision of [a licensed physician] AN
INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE MEDICINE IN THE STATE who:
(1) Specializes in radiology; and
– 73 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) Is certified by:
(i) The American Board of Radiology;
(ii) The American Osteopathic Board of Radiology;
(iii) The British Royal College of Radiology; or
(iv) The Canadian College of Physicians and Surgeons.
(q) “Supervision” means the responsibility of [a licensed physician] AN
INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE MEDICINE IN THE STATE to exercise on–site
or immediately available direction for licensees.
14–5B–07.
(a) (1) A licensee may only practice under the supervision of [a licensed
physician] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE MEDICINE IN THE STATE.
14–5B–08.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice radiation therapy, radiography, nuclear medicine technology, or
radiology assistance in this State.
14–5C–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Licensed polysomnographic technologist” means a polysomnographic
technologist who is licensed by the Board under this subtitle to practice polysomnography
under the supervision of [a licensed physician] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO
PRACTICE MEDICINE IN THE STATE.
(h) “Student” means an individual who, in accordance with section 14–5C–09(c)
of this subtitle, is:
(1) Enrolled in an accredited educational program in order to qualify for a
license under this title; and
(2) Performing polysomnography services within the accredited program
under the supervision of [a licensed physician] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO
PRACTICE MEDICINE IN THE STATE and without compensation.
– 74 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(i) “Supervision” means general or direct supervision of [a licensed
polysomnographic technologist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE
POLYSOMNOGRAPHY IN THE STATE by [a licensed physician] AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE MEDICINE IN THE STATE.
14–5C–08.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle[, on or after October 1, 2013,]
OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be
licensed by the Board before the individual may practice polysomnography in this State.
14–5D–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated
(m) (1) “Practice athletic training” means application of the following
principles and methods for managing injuries for athletic individuals in good overall health
under the supervision of [a licensed physician] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO
PRACTICE MEDICINE IN THE STATE:
(i) Prevention and wellness promotion;
(ii) Clinical evaluation, examination, assessment, and
determination of a plan of care, including appropriate referrals;
(iii) Immediate care and emergency care; and
(iv) Treatment, rehabilitation, and reconditioning.
14–5D–07.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice athletic training in the State.
14–5D–11.
(a) Nothing in this title may be construed to authorize an athletic trainer to
practice except under the supervision of [a licensed physician] AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE MEDICINE IN THE STATE.
14–5E–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
– 75 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(f) (1) “Practice perfusion” means to perform the functions necessary for the
support, treatment, measurement, or supplementation of the cardiovascular, circulatory,
or respiratory systems, or other organs to ensure the safe management of physiologic
functions by monitoring and analyzing the parameters of the systems under an order and
the supervision of [a licensed physician] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE
MEDICINE IN THE STATE.
(g) “Student” means an individual who, in accordance with § 14–5E–09(c) of this
subtitle, is:
(1) Enrolled in an accredited educational program to qualify for a license
under this subtitle; and
(2) Performing perfusion services within the accredited program under the
supervision of [a licensed perfusionist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE
PERFUSION IN THE STATE and without compensation.
(h) “Supervision” means the responsibility of [a licensed physician] AN
INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE MEDICINE IN THE STATE to exercise on site or
immediately available direction for [a licensed perfusionist] AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE PERFUSION IN THE STATE to ensure the safety and welfare
of patients during the course of perfusion.
14–5E–08.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle[, on or after October 1, 2013,]
OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be
licensed by the Board before the individual may practice perfusion in this State.
14–5F–10.
(a) [Beginning March 1, 2016, except] EXCEPT as otherwise provided in this
subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall
be licensed by the Board before the individual may practice naturopathic medicine in the
State.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(2) A student who is enrolled in an approved naturopathic medical program
while the student is participating in a course of study under the supervision of [a licensed
naturopathic doctor or a licensed professional] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO
PRACTICE NATUROPATHIC MEDICINE IN THE STATE in the field of study;
14–5G–08.
– 76 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle[, on or after January 1, 2024,]
OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be
licensed by the Board before the individual may practice genetic counseling in the State.
14–5G–14.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Qualified supervisor” means:
(i) An individual who:
1. Is [licensed] AUTHORIZED to practice as a genetic
counselor [under this subtitle] IN THE STATE; and
2. Has practiced for a minimum of 3 years after passing the
national certifying examination; or
(ii) [A physician who has been licensed] AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE MEDICINE IN THE STATE AND HAS PRACTICED MEDICINE
in the State for a minimum of 5 years.
15–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Board” means the State Board of Physicians, established under § 14–201 of
this article.
15–301.
(d) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice as a physician assistant.
15–402.1.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, a licensed physician may not
employ an individual practicing as a physician assistant who does not have a license, WHO
IS NOT OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS A PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT IN THE
STATE, or who has not provided notice to the Board as required under § 15–302(a) of this
title.
– 77 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, an employer may not employ an
individual practicing as a physician assistant who does not have a license OR IS NOT
OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS A PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT IN THE STATE.
16–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Podiatric Medical Examiners.
16–301.
[An] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, AN individual shall be licensed by the Board before the individual may practice
podiatry in this State.
17–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Board” means the State Board of Professional Counselors and Therapists.
(w) “Practice graduate alcohol and drug counseling” means to practice clinical
alcohol and drug counseling:
(1) Under the supervision of [a licensed clinical alcohol and drug counselor
or another health care provider licensed under this article] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED
TO PRACTICE ALCOHOL AND DRUG COUNSELING, MARRIAGE AND FAMILY THERAPY,
PROFESSIONAL ART THERAPY, OR PROFESSIONAL COUNSELING IN THE STATE, as
approved by the Board; and
(2) While fulfilling the requirements for supervised experience under §
17–302 of this title.
(x) “Practice graduate marriage and family therapy” means to practice clinical
marriage and family therapy:
(1) Under the supervision of [a licensed clinical marriage and family
therapist or another health care provider licensed under this article] AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE ALCOHOL AND DRUG COUNSELING, MARRIAGE AND
FAMILY THERAPY, PROFESSIONAL ART THERAPY, OR PROFESSIONAL COUNSELING
IN THE STATE, as approved by the Board; and
(2) While fulfilling the requirements for supervised experience under §
17–303 of this title.
– 78 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(y) “Practice graduate professional art therapy” means to practice clinical
professional art therapy:
(1) Under the supervision of [a licensed clinical professional art therapist
or another health care provider licensed under this article] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED
TO PRACTICE ALCOHOL AND DRUG COUNSELING, MARRIAGE AND FAMILY THERAPY,
PROFESSIONAL ART THERAPY, OR PROFESSIONAL COUNSELING IN THE STATE, as
approved by the Board; and
(2) While fulfilling the requirements for supervised experience under §
17–304.1 of this title.
(z) “Practice graduate professional counseling” means to practice clinical
professional counseling:
(1) Under the supervision of [a licensed clinical professional counselor or
another health care provider licensed under this article] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED
TO PRACTICE ALCOHOL AND DRUG COUNSELING, MARRIAGE AND FAMILY THERAPY,
PROFESSIONAL ART THERAPY, OR PROFESSIONAL COUNSELING IN THE STATE, as
approved by the Board; and
(2) While fulfilling the requirements for supervised experience under §
17–304 of this title.
17–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section OR §
10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual may not practice,
attempt to practice, or offer to practice clinical alcohol and drug counseling, clinical
marriage and family therapy, clinical professional art therapy, or clinical professional
counseling in the State unless licensed by the Board.
(b) Subject to the regulations of the Board, subsection (a) of this section does not
apply to:
(1) A student working under the supervision of [a licensed] AN
INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS A mental health care provider IN THE
STATE while pursuing a supervised course of study in counseling that the Board approves
as qualifying training and experience under this title; or
(2) An individual who, in accordance with § 17–406 of this title, is working
as a trainee under the supervision of [a licensed clinical alcohol and drug counselor or
another health care provider licensed or certified under this article] AN INDIVIDUAL
AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE ALCOHOL AND DRUG COUNSELING, MARRIAGE AND
– 79 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
FAMILY THERAPY, PROFESSIONAL ART THERAPY, OR PROFESSIONAL COUNSELING
IN THE STATE and approved by the Board while fulfilling the experiential or course of
study requirements under § 17–302 of this subtitle or § 17–403 or § 17–404 of this title.
17–310.
(b) A licensed counselor or therapist may engage in advanced assessment
activities if the licensed counselor or therapist has completed training that includes:
(2) Completion of 500 hours of supervised, direct, client–related, advanced
assessment testing that is completed not less than 2 years following the completion of the
master’s degree, of which a minimum of 100 hours shall include face–to–face supervision
by a supervisor who is:
(i) A [licensed] mental health professional AUTHORIZED TO
PRACTICE IN THE STATE;
(ii) Proficient in the use of advanced assessment tests; and
(iii) Approved by the Board; and
17–401.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO
PRACTICE ALCOHOL AND DRUG COUNSELING, MARRIAGE AND FAMILY THERAPY,
PROFESSIONAL ART THERAPY, OR PROFESSIONAL COUNSELING IN THE STATE
UNDER § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
[(a)] (B) (1) This subsection only applies to individuals certified by the Board
as a certified professional counselor or certified professional counselor–marriage and family
therapist on or before September 30, 2008.
(2) (i) An individual shall be certified as a professional counselor by the
Board before the individual may:
1. Use the title “certified professional counselor”;
2. Use the initials “C.P.C.” after the name of the individual;
or
3. Represent to the public that the individual is certified as
a professional counselor.
– 80 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(ii) A certificate to practice professional counseling issued by the
Board authorizes the certificate holder to practice professional counseling while the
certificate is effective.
(3) (i) An individual shall be certified as a professional
counselor–marriage and family therapist by the Board before the individual may:
1. Use the title “certified professional counselor–marriage
and family therapist”;
2. Use the initials “C.P.C.–M.F.T.” after the name of the
individual; or
3. Represent to the public that the individual is certified as
a certified professional counselor–marriage and family therapist.
(ii) A certificate to practice marriage and family therapy issued by
the Board authorizes the certificate holder to practice marriage and family therapy while
the certificate is effective.
[(b)] (C) (1) An individual shall be certified as a certified professional
counselor–alcohol and drug by the Board before the individual may:
(i) Use the title “certified professional counselor–alcohol and drug”;
(ii) Use the initials “C.P.C.–A.D.” after the name of the individual;
or
(iii) Represent to the public that the individual is certified as a
certified professional counselor–alcohol and drug.
(2) An individual shall be certified as a certified associate
counselor–alcohol and drug by the Board before the individual may:
(i) Use the title “certified associate counselor–alcohol and drug”;
(ii) Use the initials “C.A.C.–A.D.” after the name of the individual;
or
(iii) Represent to the public that the individual is certified as a
certified associate counselor–alcohol and drug.
(3) An individual shall be certified as a certified supervised
counselor–alcohol and drug by the Board before the individual may:
(i) Use the title “certified supervised counselor–alcohol and drug”;
– 81 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) Use the initials “C.S.C.–A.D.” after the name of the individual;
or
(iii) Represent to the public that the individual is certified as a
certified supervised counselor–alcohol and drug.
(4) A certificate to practice alcohol and drug counseling issued by the Board
authorizes the certificate holder to practice alcohol and drug counseling while the certificate
is effective.
17–403.
(c) A certified associate counselor–alcohol and drug shall practice alcohol and
drug counseling under the supervision of a Board–approved alcohol and drug supervisor
who is:
(1) A licensed clinical alcohol and drug counselor;
(2) A certified professional counselor–alcohol and drug;
(3) A licensed clinical professional counselor;
(4) A licensed clinical marriage and family therapist;
(5) A licensed clinical professional art therapist; [or]
(6) A health care provider licensed under this article with documented
expertise in alcohol and drug counseling; OR
(7) AN INDIVIDUAL OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE ALCOHOL
AND DRUG COUNSELING, MARRIAGE AND FAMILY THERAPY, PROFESSIONAL ART
THERAPY, OR PROFESSIONAL COUNSELING IN THE STATE.
17–404.
(c) A certified supervised counselor–alcohol and drug shall practice alcohol and
drug counseling under the supervision of a Board–approved alcohol and drug supervisor
who is:
(1) A licensed clinical alcohol and drug counselor;
(2) A certified professional counselor–alcohol and drug;
(3) A certified associate counselor–alcohol and drug;
– 82 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(4) A licensed clinical professional counselor;
(5) A licensed clinical marriage and family therapist;
(6) A licensed clinical professional art therapist; [or]
(7) A health care provider licensed under this article with documented
expertise in alcohol and drug counseling; OR
(8) AN INDIVIDUAL OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE ALCOHOL
AND DRUG COUNSELING, MARRIAGE AND FAMILY THERAPY, PROFESSIONAL ART
THERAPY, OR PROFESSIONAL COUNSELING IN THE STATE.
17–406.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Approved alcohol and drug supervisor” means:
(i) A certified professional counselor–alcohol and drug;
(ii) A licensed clinical alcohol and drug counselor; [or]
(iii) A health care provider licensed or certified under this article with
documented expertise in alcohol and drug counseling, as approved by the Board; OR
(IV) AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS AN ALCOHOL
AND DRUG COUNSELOR IN THE STATE.
17–6A–10.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle[, beginning January 1, 2015,]
OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be
licensed by the Board before the individual may practice behavior analysis in the State.
18–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Examiners of Psychologists.
18–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed or registered by the Board before
– 83 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
the individual may practice psychology as a psychologist or psychology associate in this
State.
(b) A registered psychology associate may practice psychology in this State only
if:
(1) The registered psychology associate is supervised by [a licensed
psychologist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE PSYCHOLOGY IN THE STATE
in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board;
(2) The supervising [licensed psychologist] INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO
PRACTICE PSYCHOLOGY IN THE STATE is jointly responsible for the provision of
psychological services by the registered psychology associate; and
(3) The registered psychology associate does not use any title other than
“registered psychology associate”.
(f) (2) An individual who is employed by any of the departments under this
subsection on July 1, 1985 but who is not licensed by the Board shall function under the
direct supervision of [a licensed psychologist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO
PRACTICE PSYCHOLOGY IN THE STATE who takes full responsibility for the
psychological services provided by the individual.
18–302.
(i) The Board shall grant a waiver of the requirements of subsections (g) and
(h)(2) of this section to an applicant for a psychology associate registration if the applicant
was approved by the Board before October 1, 2014, to practice psychology as a psychology
associate under the supervision of [a licensed psychologist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED
TO PRACTICE PSYCHOLOGY IN THE STATE.
19–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Social Work Examiners.
(j) “Practice bachelor social work” means to use the education and training
required under § 19–302(b) of this title to:
(1) Practice social work under the supervision of [a licensed certified social
worker, licensed certified social worker–clinical, licensed master social worker, or licensed
bachelor social worker] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE BACHELOR SOCIAL
WORK, MASTER SOCIAL WORK, CERTIFIED SOCIAL WORK, OR CERTIFIED SOCIAL
WORK–CLINICAL IN THE STATE who meets the conditions specified in regulations; or
– 84 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(2) If approved by the Board in accordance with § 19–302(f) of this title,
engage in independent practice.
(m) “Practice master social work” means to use the education and training
required under § 19–302(c) of this title to:
(1) Practice social work under the supervision of [a licensed certified social
worker, licensed certified social worker–clinical, or licensed master social worker] AN
INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE BACHELOR SOCIAL WORK, MASTER SOCIAL
WORK, CERTIFIED SOCIAL WORK, OR CERTIFIED SOCIAL WORK–CLINICAL IN THE
STATE who meets the conditions specified in regulations; or
(2) If approved by the Board in accordance with § 19–302(f) of this title,
engage in independent practice.
(n) (3) For an individual licensed as a master social worker, “practice social
work” also includes:
(i) Supervision of other social workers if the master social worker
meets the requirements set out in regulations;
(ii) Formulating a diagnosis, under the supervision of [a licensed
certified social worker–clinical] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE CERTIFIED
SOCIAL WORK–CLINICAL IN THE STATE;
(iii) Treatment of biopsychosocial conditions, under the supervision
of [a licensed certified social worker–clinical] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO
PRACTICE CERTIFIED SOCIAL WORK–CLINICAL IN THE STATE; and
(iv) Treatment of behavioral health disorders, including substance
use disorders, addictive disorders, and mental disorders, and the provision of
psychotherapy under the supervision of [a licensed certified social worker–clinical] AN
INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE CERTIFIED SOCIAL WORK–CLINICAL IN THE
STATE.
(4) For an individual licensed as a certified social worker, “practice social
work” also includes:
(i) Supervision of other social workers;
(ii) Formulating a diagnosis, under the supervision of [a licensed
certified social worker–clinical] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE CERTIFIED
SOCIAL WORK–CLINICAL IN THE STATE;
– 85 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) Treatment of biopsychosocial conditions, under the supervision
of [a licensed certified social worker–clinical] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO
PRACTICE CERTIFIED SOCIAL WORK–CLINICAL IN THE STATE; and
(iv) Treatment of behavioral health disorders, including substance
use disorders, addictive disorders, and mental disorders, and the provision of
psychotherapy under the supervision of [a licensed certified social worker–clinical] AN
INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE CERTIFIED SOCIAL WORK–CLINICAL IN THE
STATE.
(o) “Private practice” means the provision of psychotherapy by [a licensed
certified social worker–clinical] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE CERTIFIED
SOCIAL WORK–CLINICAL IN THE STATE who assumes responsibility and accountability
for the nature and quality of the services provided to a client:
(1) In exchange for direct payment or third–party reimbursement; or
(2) On a pro bono basis as determined in regulations adopted by the Board.
19–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be:
(1) Licensed by the Board before the individual may practice social work in
this State while representing oneself as a social worker; or
(2) Licensed as a certified social worker–clinical before the individual may
practice clinical social work in this State.
19–302.
(f) (4) Nothing in this subsection may be construed to prohibit an employer
from requiring supervision of [a licensed bachelor social worker or a licensed master social
worker] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE SOCIAL WORK OR MASTER
SOCIAL WORK IN THE STATE who is approved to engage in independent practice under
this subsection.
(5) The Board shall approve a licensee to provide supervision, in
accordance with regulations adopted by the Board, if the licensee:
(i) Is [a licensed bachelor social worker or a licensed master social
worker] AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE SOCIAL WORK OR MASTER SOCIAL WORK IN THE
STATE AND approved to engage in independent practice under this subsection;
– 86 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
19–307.
(c) (2) A licensed master social worker may not:
(i) Engage in independent practice unless the licensed master social
worker is approved by the Board to engage in independent practice in accordance with §
19–302(f) of this subtitle;
(ii) Treat behavioral health or emotional disorders or provide
psychotherapy without the supervision of [a licensed certified social worker–clinical] AN
INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE CERTIFIED SOCIAL WORK–CLINICAL IN THE
STATE;
(iii) Diagnose a behavioral health disorder without the supervision of
[a licensed certified social worker–clinical] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE
CERTIFIED SOCIAL WORK–CLINICAL IN THE STATE; or
(iv) Engage in private practice.
(3) A licensed certified social worker may not:
(i) Treat behavioral health or emotional disorders or provide
psychotherapy without the supervision of [a licensed certified social worker–clinical] AN
INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE CERTIFIED SOCIAL WORK–CLINICAL IN THE
STATE;
(ii) Diagnose a mental disorder without the supervision of [a
licensed certified social worker–clinical] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE
CERTIFIED SOCIAL WORK–CLINICAL IN THE STATE; or
(iii) Engage in private practice.
20–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Board” means the State Board for Certification of Residential Child Care
Program Professionals.
20–301.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection OR § 10–14A–03 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall receive a certificate from the
Board before the individual may be a program administrator in this State.
– 87 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection[, on or before
October 1, 2015,] OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an
individual shall receive a certificate from the Board before the individual may be a
residential child and youth care practitioner in this State.
21–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(a–1) “Apprenticeship” means a program of training and experience under the
supervision of [a licensed environmental health specialist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED
TO PRACTICE AS AN ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH SPECIALIST IN THE STATE that is part
of the requirements for a Board–approved baccalaureate degree from an accredited college
or university.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Environmental Health Specialists.
(e) “Environmental health specialist–in–training program” means a program of
training and experience under the supervision of [a licensed environmental health
specialist] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS AN ENVIRONMENTAL
HEALTH SPECIALIST IN THE STATE or other individual acceptable to the Board.
21–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Board before the
individual may practice as an environmental health specialist in this State.
Article – Insurance
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(k) “Commissioner” means the Maryland Insurance Commissioner.
10–103.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this article OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, before a person acts as an insurance producer in the State, the
person must obtain:
(1) a license in the kind or subdivision of insurance for which the person
intends to act as an insurance producer; and
– 88 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(2) if acting for an insurer, an appointment from the insurer.
10–203.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, a person must obtain a license before the person acts as an
adviser in the State.
10–304.
(a) [An] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, AN individual must obtain a license before the individual
provides bail bondsman services in the State.
10–403.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, a person must obtain a license before the person acts as a public
adjuster in the State.
26–201.
[A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, A person may not provide motor club service or engage in the business of a motor
club in the State unless the person meets the requirements of this title and has a license
issued by the Commissioner.
Article – Labor and Employment
7–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Labor and Industry.
7–301.
Except as otherwise provided in this title OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, an individual shall be licensed by the Commissioner before the
individual may perform a farm labor contracting service in the State for consideration.
9–6A–09.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO
PROVIDE REHABILITATION COUNSELING OR VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION
– 89 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SERVICES IN THE STATE UNDER § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE.
[(a)] (B) To qualify for registration, a nurse case manager shall be certified as
such by the State Board of Nursing.
[(b)] (C) To qualify for registration, a rehabilitation counselor shall:
(1) have a bachelor’s degree from an accredited institution in rehabilitation
counseling, human services, psychology, or a related field with at least 1 year of work
experience in a human services occupation;
(2) have a master’s or doctoral degree in rehabilitation counseling, human
services, psychology, education, or a related field; or
(3) be a certified rehabilitation counselor, certified vocational evaluator,
certified disability management specialist, hold an equivalent national certification that is
acceptable to the Commission, or have met all of the education and experience
requirements to be eligible to be certified.
[(c)] (D) To qualify for registration, a vocational evaluator shall:
(1) have a bachelor’s degree from an accredited institution in vocational
evaluation, rehabilitation psychology, human services, education, or a related field with 1
year of work experience in that field;
(2) have a master’s or doctoral degree in rehabilitation, vocational
evaluation, psychology, human services, education, or a related field; or
(3) be certified or have met all of the educational and experience
requirements to be eligible to be certified in vocational evaluation by the Commission on
certification of work adjustment and vocational evaluation specialists, or have met all of
the education and experience requirements to be eligible for certification.
[(d)] (E) In addition to the requirements of subsections [(b)] (C) and [(c)] (D) of
this section:
(1) a rehabilitation counselor who has met the education requirements
under subsection [(b)(1)] (C)(1) or (2) of this section to qualify for registration shall work
under the administrative supervision of AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS
a [certified] rehabilitation counselor, [certified] vocational evaluator, [certified] disability
management specialist, [certified] case manager, or [certified] rehabilitation registered
nurse IN THE STATE; and
– 90 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(2) a vocational evaluator who has met the education requirements under
subsection [(c)(1)] (D)(1) or (2) of this section shall work under the administrative
supervision of AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS a [certified] vocational
evaluator, [certified] rehabilitation counselor, [certified] disability management specialist,
[certified] case manager, or [certified] rehabilitation registered nurse IN THE STATE.
Article – Natural Resources
4–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(i) “Department” means Department of Natural Resources.
4–211.
(a) (1) [Any] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ANY person who desires to commercially practice the art of
taxidermy or who desires to mount or preserve any species of finfish for a person other than
himself first shall obtain a taxidermist and fur–tanning license.
5–417.
(a) (1) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, A person may not engage in the work or business of a tree expert
without a license issued under the provisions of this part.
Article – Public Safety
11–105.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, a person shall obtain a license issued under this subtitle before
the person engages in business as a manufacturer or dealer, possesses explosives other
than explosives for use in firearms, or possesses or stores explosives for use in firearms in
the State.
(b) (1) A person shall obtain a license to engage in business as a dealer under
this subtitle before the person engages in the business of loading or reloading small arms
ammunition in the State.
(2) The owner or operator of a mine, quarry, or other operation or business
that uses explosives, or a contractor who performs work that uses explosives, shall obtain
a license to engage in business as a dealer under this subtitle.
(c) This section does not apply to [the]:
– 91 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) THE armed forces, the National Guard, the State Guard, or officers or
employees of the United States, the State, or a local subdivision of the State who are
authorized to handle explosives in the performance of their duties; OR
(2) AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO HANDLE EXPLOSIVES IN THE
STATE UNDER § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(d) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, a person need not obtain a
license to possess or store up to 5 pounds of smokeless powder for the loading or reloading
of small arms ammunition, and up to 5 pounds of black powder for the loading or reloading
of small arms ammunition or for use in the loading of antique arms or replicas of antique
arms, if the smokeless powder and black powder are stored in their original shipping
containers and are possessed only for personal use in firearms.
(2) A person may not possess or store explosives for use in firearms in any
quantity in multifamily dwellings, apartments, dormitories, hotels, schools, other public
buildings, or buildings or structures open for public use.
(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of this subsection, the State Fire
Marshal may issue a permit to allow temporary possession of explosives for use in firearms
in a building or structure open for public use.
12–606.
[A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, A person shall be certified by the State Fire Marshal as a nongovernmental
electrical inspector before the person inspects or certifies an electrical installation.
12–801.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Board” means the Elevator Safety Review Board.
12–826.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in Part III of this subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, a person shall be licensed by the Board as an
elevator mechanic before the person erects, constructs, wires, alters, replaces, maintains,
repairs, dismantles, or services elevator units in the State.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in Part III of this subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, a person shall be licensed by the Board as an
elevator contractor before the person engages in the business of erecting, constructing,
– 92 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
wiring, altering, replacing, maintaining, repairing, dismantling, or servicing elevator units
in the State.
(c) (1) Except as otherwise provided in Part III of this subtitle OR §
10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, a person shall be licensed by the
Board as an elevator renovator contractor before the person engages in the business of
elevator renovating.
(2) By June 1, 2004, a person who engages in the business of elevator
renovating for a business incorporated before January 1, 2002, shall be licensed by the
Board as an elevator renovator contractor before the person engages in the business of
elevator renovating.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in Part III of this subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, a person shall be licensed by the Board as an
elevator renovator mechanic before the person performs elevator renovator work.
(e) Except as otherwise provided in Part III of this subtitle OR § 10–14A–03 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, a person shall be licensed by the Board as an
accessibility lift mechanic before the person erects, constructs, wires, alters, replaces,
maintains, repairs, dismantles, or services commercial stairway chairlifts, vertical platform
lifts, or incline platform lifts in the State.
(f) (2) (i) An individual who works as an elevator apprentice under the
direct supervision of [a licensed] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS AN
elevator mechanic or [licensed] AN elevator renovator mechanic IN THE STATE need not
obtain a license.
(ii) An individual commonly known as an elevator helper who works
under the direct supervision of [a licensed] AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE
AS AN elevator mechanic or [a licensed] AN elevator renovator mechanic IN THE STATE
need not obtain a license.
12–832.
(a) While an elevator mechanic license is in effect, it authorizes the licensee to
erect, construct, wire, alter, replace, maintain, repair, dismantle, or service elevator units
under the direct supervision of AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS [a
licensed] AN elevator contractor IN THE STATE.
(e) While an accessibility lift mechanic license is in effect, the license authorizes
the licensee to erect, construct, wire, alter, replace, maintain, repair, dismantle, and service
commercial stairway chairlifts, vertical platform lifts, or incline platform lifts under the
direct supervision of AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE AS [a licensed] AN
elevator contractor IN THE STATE.
– 93 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
13–704.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Eligible service member” means an individual engaged in military
service.
(3) “Eligible spouse” means the spouse of an eligible service member.
(4) “Military service” means:
(i) in the case of an individual who is a member or reserve member
of the armed forces, full–time duty in the active military service, including:
1. full–time training duty;
2. annual training duty; and
3. attendance while at a school designated as a service school
by federal law or by the secretary of the military department concerned;
(ii) in the case of a resident of the State who is a member of a reserve
component of the uniformed services, service under a call to:
1. active service authorized by the President of the United
States, the Secretary of Defense, or the Secretary of Health and Human Services for a
period of more than 30 days in response to a national emergency declared by the President
of the United States; or
2. active duty for a period of more than 30 consecutive days;
(iii) in the case of an individual who is a commissioned officer of the
Public Health Service or the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, active
service; or
(iv) any period during which an individual is absent from duty on
account of sickness, wounds, leave, or other lawful cause.
(b) This section is intended to supplement rights and protections provided in the
federal Servicemembers Civil Relief Act [(50 U.S.C. App. 501 et seq.)].
(c) (1) In addition to the rights and protections regarding consumer
transactions, contracts, and service providers included in [Title III of] the federal
Servicemembers Civil Relief Act [(50 U.S.C. App. 531 through 538)], an eligible service
member or eligible spouse may terminate a contract described in paragraph (2) of this
– 94 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
subsection at any time after the date the eligible service member receives official orders to
relocate for a period of military service of at least 90 days to a location where the eligible
service member would be unable to use the services under the contract.
(2) This section applies to a contract to provide any of the following:
(i) telecommunication services;
(ii) Internet services;
(iii) television services;
(iv) athletic club or gym memberships; and
(v) satellite radio services.
(3) (i) An eligible service member or eligible spouse may terminate a
contract under this section by delivering a written or electronic notice of the termination
and a copy of the eligible service member’s official orders to the service provider.
(ii) If an eligible service member or eligible spouse terminates a
contract, the service provider shall provide the eligible service member or eligible spouse
with a written or electronic notice of the eligible service member’s rights posted on the
Maryland National Guard’s Internet website.
(d) (1) If an eligible service member or eligible spouse terminates or suspends
the provision of services under this section and the eligible service member is no longer in
military service, the eligible service member or eligible spouse may reinstate the provision
of service on the same terms and conditions as originally agreed to with the service provider
before the termination or suspension on written notice to the provider that the eligible
service member is no longer in military service.
(2) Written notice under this subsection shall be given within 90 days after
termination of the eligible service member’s military service.
(e) An eligible service member or eligible spouse who terminates, suspends, or
reinstates the provision of services under this section:
(1) may not be charged a penalty, fee, loss of deposit, or any other
additional cost because of the termination, suspension, or reinstatement; and
(2) is not liable for payment for any services after the effective date of the
termination or suspension, until the effective date of any reinstatement of services.
Article – Public Utilities
– 95 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Commission” means the Public Service Commission.
7–317.
(a) (1) [Beginning] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, BEGINNING July 1, 2025, a person may not engage in the
business of an energy salesperson in the State unless the person holds a license issued by
the Commission.
7–318.
(a) [Beginning] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, BEGINNING July 1, 2025, a person may not engage in the
business of an energy vendor in the State unless the person holds a license issued by the
Commission.
24–106.
(b) (1) A person holding a valid master plumber/gasfitter license or a
journeyman plumber/gasfitter license issued by the Commission is entitled to an equivalent
license issued by the State Board of Plumbing without examination on presentation of:
(i) the license issued by the Commission; and
(ii) a notarized statement of good standing issued by the
Commission.
(2) A person holding a valid master plumber/gasfitter license or a
journeyman plumber/gasfitter license issued by the State Board of Plumbing is entitled to
an equivalent license issued by the Commission without examination on presentation of
the license issued by the State Board of Plumbing.
(3) SUBJECT TO § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE,
AN INDIVIDUAL HOLDING A VALID MASTER PLUMBER/GASFITTER LICENSE IN
ANOTHER STATE IS ENTITLED TO AN EQUIVALENT LICENSE ISSUED BY THE
COMMISSION WITHOUT EXAMINATION ON PRESENTATION OF THE LICENSE ISSUED
BY THE COMMISSION.
Article – Real Property
7–105.1.
– 96 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(e) An order to docket or a complaint to foreclose a mortgage or deed of trust on
residential property shall:
(1) Include:
(i) If applicable, the license number of:
1. The mortgage originator; and
2. The mortgage lender; and
(ii) An affidavit stating:
1. The date on which the default occurred and the nature of
the default; and
2. If applicable, that:
A. A notice of intent to foreclose was sent to the mortgagor or
grantor in accordance with subsection (c) of this section and the date on which the notice
was sent; and
B. At the time the notice of intent to foreclose was sent, the
contents of the notice of intent to foreclose were accurate; and
(2) Be accompanied by:
(i) The original or a certified copy of the mortgage or deed of trust;
(ii) A statement of the debt remaining due and payable supported by
an affidavit of the plaintiff or the secured party or the agent or attorney of the plaintiff or
secured party;
(iii) A copy of the debt instrument accompanied by an affidavit
certifying ownership of the debt instrument;
(iv) If applicable, the original or a certified copy of the assignment of
the mortgage for purposes of foreclosure or the deed of appointment of a substitute trustee;
(v) If any defendant is an individual, an affidavit that is in
compliance with [§ 521] § 3931 of the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act[, 50 U.S.C. App. §
501 et seq.];
(vi) If applicable, a copy of the notice of intent to foreclose;
– 97 –

Ch. 694 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(vii) If the secured party and mortgagor or grantor have elected to
participate in prefile mediation, the report of the prefile mediation issued by the Office of
Administrative Hearings;
(viii) If the secured party and the mortgagor or grantor have not
elected to participate in prefile mediation, a statement that the parties have not elected to
participate in prefile mediation;
(ix) In addition to any other filing fees required by law, a filing fee in
the amount of $450; and
(x) 1. If the loss mitigation analysis has been completed subject
to subsection (g) of this section, a final loss mitigation affidavit in the form prescribed by
regulation adopted by the Commissioner of Financial Regulation; and
2. If the loss mitigation analysis has not been completed, a
preliminary loss mitigation affidavit in the form prescribed by regulation adopted by the
Commissioner of Financial Regulation.
Article – Transportation
15–402.
(a) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, A person may not act as a vehicle salesman unless the person is licensed by the
Administration under this subtitle.
15–502.
(a) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, A person may not conduct the business of an automotive dismantler and recycler
or a scrap processor, or engage in the business of acquiring or offering to purchase or remove
vehicles which are to be dismantled in whole or in part by that person for the sale of usable
parts, unless the person is licensed by the Administration under this subtitle.
(b) (1) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, A person may not advertise for the purchase, towing, or removal
of junk or abandoned vehicles unless the person is licensed by the Administration under
this subtitle.
(2) Any advertisement for the purchase, towing, or removal of junk or
abandoned vehicles by a licensee under this subtitle shall include the license number of the
licensee.
– 98 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 694
(c) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, A person may not store on any private property for more than 30 days any
vehicle that is to be dismantled, destroyed, or scrapped, unless the person is an automotive
dismantler and recycler or a scrap processor licensed under this subtitle.
15–602.
[A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, A person may not conduct the business of a title service agent unless the person
is licensed by the Administration under this subtitle.
15–702.
[A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, A person may not conduct a drivers’ school unless the person is licensed by the
Administration under this subtitle.
15–802.
[A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 10–14A–03 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, A person may not act as a driving instructor unless the person is licensed by the
Administration under this subtitle.
23–103.1.
(b) (1) (I) The Division shall:
[(i)] 1. Administer an examination to each inspection mechanic
applicant; and
[(ii)] 2. If the Division determines the applicant is qualified,
license the inspection mechanic applicant to conduct vehicle inspections.
[(2)] (II) The examination shall include a written test and a practical test.
(2) THE DIVISION MAY NOT REQUIRE AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED
TO CONDUCT VEHICLE INSPECTIONS IN THE STATE UNDER § 10–14A–03 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE TO CONDUCT AN EXAMINATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 99 –